After 3 months, my garden now is flourishing with different plants and more to come :)
An average tool in the best hands will always produce better results than the best tool in average hands. ― Don Groves
Not too bad, ha ha, but at least we got something!! I rather doubt they got enough water and were totally shaded by the tomatoes.
Be Well, Be Safe, and Blessed Be…
My heroes never bring on their fate. Perhaps my books would be more dramatic if they did, but I cannot sympathize with characters who are the cause of their own problems. And why do they have to when life itself is always ready to cause problems for them?
Miss Georgia Girl is also celebrating a birthday today! Although she has gone MIA on the blog-front I forgive her because she was my blog inspiration. She got that sweet baby girl home from China and I know she keeps her busy! Happy Birthday A. - I hope that it is the best one yet!
Earlier in the week the court had reversed a judge’s decision to dismiss Arthur’s appeal, which contended that Alabama’s decision to use a new sedative called pentobarbital as part of a three-drug execution combination could be cruel and unusual punishment.
"Well I have apologised Madam."
These jeans disappeared at some point and I suspect Kathy Heckathorne to be the culprit, sneaking them into the Goodwill pile when helping me with a move. Unfortunately for her, Zara.com has a whole range of zippered denim goodness and I bought this white version.
"She's already Facebook stalked you," he added.
(C) Incompetent
I have no idea what the truth surrounding his resignation is, though I have heard a few rumours some credible and some of such a pathetic 'nudge nudge wink wink you do know he's a poof' nature that it's a miracle I am not doing time for assault or worse. I really have no earthly idea why your anti-gay type, in common with racists and misogynists need to be so evangelical with their views. Time and time again I've tried to terminate cliche ridden hate rants by informing the preacher that I'm not overly fussed by homosexuality, cannot help but think their ex-wife must have had a certain amount of right on her side and harbour no hatred towards Pakistanis.
It is amazing to think that taking away words like “birthday” or “dinosaur” is healthy and good! Sure there are people who may not celebrate birthdays or even believe in dinosaurs but now these words now being deemed “inappropriate”. It doesn’t make sense to me! How is it that kids and teachers alike in many schools have no problem cussing and using strong language that is much more offensive than “Rock ‘n’ Roll” and yet have no problem doing so? Moreover, most kids wouldn’t be allowed to have any kind of music device or phone carrying mp3s on their persons trolling the halls school! I feel like if we are gonna ban words, let’s ban words that are truly offensive! What do you think about New York’s ban on these words? Give me some feedback!
We are committed to excellence. This is the standard to which we aspire in everything we do. We are asked to offer our best even when something less may be acceptable to others; and to always uphold the standards relevant to our discipline or practice.
playing "American Patrol."
Once you have the fullness of colors on the right side of your locket, it will automatically fuel the colors and energy needed on the left side. You may suddenly have an inspiration, or an opportunity, or meet someone new, or maybe even see an ad on TV that you seem to pay closer attention to… trust it, move towards it all. Action is crucial.
Regardless of where you are at in your life, albeit at the best peak you have seen yet or the lowest and darkest shallows you loathe so much, goal setting can help. If the last time you thought about goal setting was over a beer (or more than one) on new years eve only to wake up the next day realising you broke the oath at 12.01am then you definitely need to stick around for this.
He’s also a psycho and kind of a dick to the people he works with, but whatever, he’s really not interesting. Not that any of the other characters are either, but whatever.
Tapers burn a slow… one and a 1/2 hours and inch.
I hope the taggy blankie keeps your wee-one entertained long enough for you to go to the bathroom and run a brush through your hair...two things that have become luxuries for me since I entered motherhood.
The possession of truth confers knowledge and liberation from sin
Anywhoooo (stay on track here Tammy) today we were talking about illustrations. How illustrators can use different tools to make their pictures interesting! In the story, it describes Rainbow Fish as different shades of blue, purple and green. One of my little sweeties says, "Mrs Lee, what does shade mean?" So, I explain what it means. The kids then start talking about how they could make different shades by pressing hard while coloring, or coloring very lightly. Now, I am not an Art teacher. Painting is sooooo not my favorite thing to do. Today...it was time to paint!! It was the easiest way for me to show them how to make a color darker and lighter! I believe the correct terms are tints and shades.
The sides served with gumbo include saltines crackers and potato salad. Most of the time you would just put a dollop of potato salad on the side of the bowl of gumbo. Large crowds would have to eat standing up, or sitting on a tree stump or a lawn chair, so it was impractical to balance a separate dish for the potato salad. The potato salad was usually very plain and bland, the coldness and blandness to offset the spice of the gumbo. It just sort of melted into the hot mixture of gumbo and rice, something we all ate and never thought twice about. Sometimes when there was extra money or a special occasion there would be a loaf of French bread served, but that was rare. With so many children already running around and more always on the way, there were few luxuries!
At the time of the riots, South L.A. was almost 50% African American. Many with the means to leave have since moved to areas such as the Inland Empire and Lancaster and Palmdale in the Antelope Valley.
In the same class I have an exam tomorrow morning at 9:45 am, which I am not at all prepared for. I am a little nervous, and only starting to study now, with less than 12 hours left until the exam.
7. Anything else you want to say? I am a grill master and an impressive species of suburban neanderthal.
Just like a fucking dick I went and blew all that money I'd swindled off oul Granny in the Old Folks' Home buying up cocaine and Russian Standard vodka. So there would be no date with Deidre for the foreseeable, unless, that is, she were partial to McDonald's, cos that's as far as my coinage would stretch.
1) you must take your time and peruse all the racks, grabbing anything you might want to try on. At Winners, you are not likely to come back out and try more things on after the first round.
I was bullied by the kids at school when I was little. I was an easy target because I quiet and intimidated by nearly everyone. I grew up with a fear of confrontation that followed me into adulthood. It has taken me years to build up my self-esteem and confidence back up.
Now this guy is taking up valuable space unconscious on the floor.
Howdy! No STAFF meeting today--yippeee...
So many wrong choices, so much negative energy sown into the atmosphere.
Goodwill, they tried.
You are finished!
Developing your listening skills is probably the most valuable thing you can do in order to be better at sales and in life. People are not good listeners in general because they focus too much on themselves. As we mentioned before you have to set your own self interest aside, just for a moment and understand what the buyer is telling you. Once you understand what it is that the buyer is looking for then you can more effectively sell your product or idea. After all it does you no good attempting to sell something to a person who has no interest in buying, no matter how good you are at sales.
I have a new tutorial up at The Pioneer Woman's if you haven't seen it yet.
1 – AAAFTS Traffic Safety Culture Index, January 2012 – “…the current traffic safety culture that might be characterized most appropriately as a “do as I say, not as I do”… For example, substantial numbers of drivers say that it is completely unacceptable to drive 10 mph over the speed limit on residential streets yet admit having done that in the past month. (http://www.aaafoundation.org/pdf/2011TSCIndex.pdf)
City of Chino:
Thank you for letting me share what has held me in the grip of impassioned experimentation for the last year and a half.
I've read several accounts of the early landings in New South Wales that said the prisoners stumbled ashore, starving, and hardly able to care for themselves. Most had been convicted of theft, and the women, though none in the first ships were transported for prostitution, often improved their conditions through liaisons with the crew, becoming 'sea wives.'
My low-profile here is a result of my struggle with depression. I have many things going on in my life right now that I cannot share on this blog and they have resulted in some mild depression. I've confided in several people and I know their prayers help so I will share with you too so that if you are inclined, you too can pray.
Peace and greens,
1 tbsp of dried basil
We are used to thinking about tyranny as a function of governmental excess. Never before in history has this kind of information monopoly been in the hands of non-governmental institutions. This is completely new and we have no idea where it leads.
Honestly I can’t really say. I think it would take a lot of study. Perhaps there is a correlation of the color wavelenth to the numeric base of the planet? Or perhaps the color simply resonates well with the planet’s intrinsic personality? This seems easier to explore…
The ad “expresses an illegal preference for a Christian roommate, thus excluding people of other faiths,” according to the complaint filed by the Fair Housing Center of West Michigan.
I have a very romantic imagination and I love to daydream. I think most women feel that way. . . We know how we wish to be treated. I just try and capture those daydreams and put them into my novels.
Mix cream cheese in mixer until smooth. Add sour cream. Add 1 egg at a time.
She insisted she’d put a real tag on it.
Tel: 67460041
The Labour leader replied: “We should be totally intolerant of people who are skiving off”. He added: “I want a health service where if people aren’t doing their jobs properly, they aren’t doing their jobs any more. We should find a way to crack down on this and stop it happening.
Denise: With the push of ebooks, I think writers will be getting to more and more people and faster.
Do you guys love reading books? Well I am. Actually I love classic novels which for some people is a boring hobby. I started liking those books when I was in highschool. Back then we were assigned to read a certain book and asked to make a report out of it. I believe my first book report was from the book “Little Prince” and with that as my foundation, I started to read more books like “Christmas Carol”, “Romeo and Juliet”, “Hatchet”, “Mythology” etcetera etcetera.
Enough of hurt
Kitchen spaces are hard places to create movement, because they are typically so sterile (even the homey ones). But, here homeowner Jamie Gottschall created a kitchen that is visually stimulating, different and welcoming all at the same time. Her inspiration was Willy Wonka and the Chocolate Factory. House Beautiful. June 2006.
How do you get names for your characters?
April 5th to 15th, Balmain Easter Fair
L’Oreal Voluminous Million Lashes: The name of this mascara does exactly that, it makes you look like you have a million lashes. I normally am not fond of rubber bristles but the formula on this makes lashes look so long and volumized! I used to use Lancome’s Definicils mascara and this is a very close dupe to that.
a ripple
Stairlift complete breakdowns can be expensive and also annoying: Many stairlift firms will give you a yearly stairway elevate servicing contract once your warrantee features elapsed. The initial train of contemplation on finding the price of these once-a-year program agreements is usually to influx all of them farewell.
16. Liza Minnelli with Billy Stritch “Ev’ry Time We Say Goodbye”
Paul saw that all needs can be met from God’s unsearchable riches. (19) And my God will supply all your needs according to His riches in glory in Christ Jesus. Paul uses the term “riches of glory” several times in his writings, Rom 9:23, Eph 3:16, here in Php 4:19 and in Col 1:27. However he describes them in Eph 2:7 as being “immeasurable riches of his grace” and in Eph 3:8 as the “unsearchable riches” of Christ.
Stranraer is 65 miles cross-country from us, and a good 90 miles on the decent road.
Vessels God uses are vessels not contaminated by the ways of the world.
Healthy belief: Happiness, fulfillment and meaning do not come from perfection, but from living a balanced life with compassion towards myself and others. No one is perfect but we all do the best we can with what we have.
This week promises to be a crazy one...again. Also trying to come to grips with the fact that it is May already! Work is so busy but it is good! I am having so much fun helping my clients achieve the dream home they want but whew! I am exhausted every night! Still trying to figure out the balance, but then again, who isn't?!
There's a good reason that you wouldn't want to go into space in anything that wasn't a minimum of bullet-proof, though: micro-meteorites. These are small rocks, generally less than a gram (smaller than bullets) but they travel at anything from one to eighty kilometers a second (0.6 to almost 50 miles a second, so even the slow ones are doing over 3100 f/s).
It's become a new obsession as I begin to check my items to see how many 'watchers' I have (spooky) and how many bids there are on my unopened pack of aged 2-3 Bob the Builder pants (no joke).
I cut the recipe in half.
1 Cup of blueberries
Larry GOLDINGS (Organ)
27. The Opposing Venus - Argosy All-Story Weekly 4 parts Oct 13,20, 27, Nov 3
There’s no time for any of it. I need to prioritise. And remain positive.
2009: Mark Teixeira (2nd)
Cheese making has been a goal of the Kitchen Witch for as long as she cares to remember. Maybe it was reading Little House books, or just the foodie that's always been there, but even as a young teen the Witch has wanted to make her own cheese. That's normal, right? Don't you all dream about making your own cheese? No? Well...pretend like you do, 'k? Do you need to make your own ricotta? No, you don't. Should you make your own ricotta? Yes! Yes you should indeed ! It's easy, quick and really doesn't require any specialty equipment or ingredients. 4 ingredients is all it takes to make the smoothest, richest, silkiest ricotta cheese you've ever been lucky enough to try.
Physically, baby girl is stretching my lower ligaments like nobody's business. When I told my mom I didn't remember this much pain last time, she said I wouldn't because it's a second baby thing. But it hurts to even stand, to walk. Carrying Brayden? Forget it. And the poor kid loves his mama lately, and it is hard to say no. I am taking regular tylenol as needed and warm baths and night. I think I just need to listen to my body, but there is SO much going on right now- I am just plugging away through the days. *sigh*
You can become Exalted with Ironforge by buying an Ironforge Tabard and wearing it while in any instance, including low level ones. You will get reputation for every mob killed. The mounts are all available from the Amberstill Ranch in Dun Morogh.
-He loves to get in on the wrestling that takes place between Peyton, Lawson and Daddy...its so cute, when the others are going at it on the floor, he can't stand to not be up in the middle of it all as well
Seventy.
1. Conversation dominated by those who have the least to say
Looking Back
For though I be free from all men, yet have I made myself servant to all, that I might gain the more. And to the Jews I became as a Jew, that I might gain the Jews; to them that are under the law, as under the law, that I might gain them that are under the law; To them that are without law, as without law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to Christ,) that I might gain them that are without law. To the weak became I as weak, that I might gain the weak: I am made all things to all men, that I might by all means save some. And this I do for the gospel’s sake, that I might be partaker thereof with you.
These snakes did something I was TOTALLY unaware snakes could do. They DOVE UNDER THE SURFACE. Katy and I immediately agreed that we did not like thinking of them UNDER the water. I felt a little faint when I first saw it, I was trying to get a photo and it just went head-first right down and disappeared into the darker water below, tail last. It came up about 20 or so seconds later several feet away, pointed in a different direction.
“I am extremely pleased with your success! But we also understand that my task was and will consist only, in the first place, to show you the meditative techniques for progressively realizing all this, and, secondly, to warn you of possible errors and pointing out to you your own mistakes if they are already made.
So, after several trips to the home improvement store, my DIY-photo lights were born! Made out of ductwork pieces!!! They look like something out of Star Trek, but, hey, they work... Kudos to my hubby!!
As for StyleMob, I'm actually pretty impressed with them since so far they've managed to keep it a positive place. Of course, it is still in friends-only beta mode, which is why you have to be my friend to join. I wonder how it'll fair once it's open to the masses, since there are some pretty cruel jerks out there. But, I will say if you enjoy street style to give StyleMob a go. While obviously I don't care much about the lower ratings, it's still fun to see how people perceive my outfits.
It is a generational ship, a refugee ship, onboard are half a million beings, most the great-grandchildren of the original inhabitants. They are survivors of a devastating war 200,000 years ago on the other end of the galaxy. They have been looking for a home. Don’t worry, they have no interest in earth, they do not want to go to an inhabited planet, and they cannot breathe our atmosphere.
The old declaring, “Unity in diversity” is generally detected with the present circumstance. Since one can find a variety of mobile smartphone companies attainable with the United kingdom markets, even so the first selection of the buyers will be the Samsung mobile devices. The gigantic company provides a series regarding cell phone models in which serve the total globe. The new mobile of Samsung may be the Samsung Galaxy Tab. Your gadget is combined with essential functions together with elegant mobile cellphone prices.
A source close to the rescue team said: "The body was found next to a half-full bottle of gin, slumped face down on a gentle slope.
Roasted Beet Salad
The EPA tried to throttle “fracking” and they lost the battle in court when their testing science was found to be less that perfect. Pure water samples were found to have “fracking” chemical contamination by the EPA testers. The courts stop short of calling it fraud, but then again how did the fracking fluids get into pure water samples. Case dismissed.
So, here are some things I like about BDDS:
Annie (to Eve): “I am supposed to be your protector, not your teething ring.”
My Darling Clementine: Put Your Hair Back
It is time to re-enter the realm of the English supermarket. Don’t worry – there are plenty more tropical surprises to come but for now let’s hold the mustard. The word on the street is that Asda house some of the finest Clementines (Citrus Reticulata) in the UK. This is the type of rumour that excites livewithfruit so without further ado let’s crack on with the Clementine.
Whatever the intimate details, the financial settlement appears to be generous. Hugh has already bought Miss Hong a fine house in London, one mile away from his own place. This will allow him to stroll over when the baby needs to be cuddled or listen to goo-goo noises. He seems, for now, to be relishing the prospect of such duties:
Check often to make sure the turkey balls are not browning too much.
Over in Germany, Schalke 04 put on a fantastic tribute to Raúl during his last game at the Veltins Arena, and put Real Madrid to shame for still not honoring its former captain. The club had organized a video tribute to Raúl, then he and his family took a lap around the stadium to bask in the adoration of the fans, and then his jersey was retired. What a lovely gesture from Schalke! And to think that Raúl only spent two years there; what an impression he made! Meanwhile, Real Madrid, his club of almost 20 years, has done absolutely nothing. He deserves something similar in the Bernabéu. By the way, Schalke won the game 4-0 (Raúl scored one goal and our former player Klaas-Jan Huntelaar two more).
I am posting a card I made this week. It has been so long I think I may have forgotten how to do this:))) I may put it in a challenge, but maybe not. I just feel great about actually being able to make something again and getting it posted.
Well thats all for now,I have more photos but have not sorted them yet.
Add the shrimp for no longer than 3 minutes per side (if they’re frozen add 2 minutes or so)
kids' table and chairs set. my client had inherited an old table and chairs set from family, and wanted it to match her daughter's new playroom. she gave me a pretty loose "alphabet" theme, and told me to stay with gender neutral colors, so i came up with this!
Much of the above narrative was, of course, taken from well known Gordon Brown quotations (with some midifications to suit my purposes!) … it is quite possible, in the real thing, that he will rehash some of his most famous lines?
(Even without rain or pains, our bed is much too comfy-cozy to tear away from, especially when it’s still dark out.)
Coming from the U.S., particularly from two extended families that live in or very close to large agricultural communities, I’ve always been very familiar with cattle.
Xcut oval cutter
Tucked into beds while sugar plums did their dances in sleepy little heads.
Amanpour: thanks for coming everyone
PKR needs to do some soul searching as to why it can only manage to get Chinese votes . In fact many nonpartisan people have expressed concern over the direction PKR is going, and some even perceived that UMNO style politics of partonage are being practised in PKR.
Cloves, 5 pcs
in some strange way speak to something in my soul
You’ve made it through the first little three-rock-block of cover tunes to open your set with an upbeat, familiar bang. Well, familiar to the college kids you actually want to be playing for at the dive bars downtown, anyway.
Iván Meade - What is your next design venture?
Here’s a scene in Living with the Truth. The setting: Jonathan and Truth have just sat down to lunch in a local café. They’re both having fish and chips when Jonathan decides to ask truth about the existence of God:
Our player of the season so far, Samir “El Rufai” Nasri has been on scintillating form this season. His 14 goals and a few assists have proven to us that we can’t really lay all our Red and White eggs in the El Capitan basket. El Rufai unfortunately tweaked his hammy when we played Huddersfield Town. The prognosis for such an injury is 3 weeks. It’s really unfortunate that Nasri will miss the 1st leg against the BarcAliens. He’ll be back for the 2nd leg in their invasion HQ. It’s also good to hear that a new deal is on the cards for a player that deserves one. I pray it reaches “6 digits”.
This sort of story also encourages us to THINK in capital letters, and it does raise some interesting questions about gene pools, designer babies and the "Third World". But we were much more refreshed by the interpretation of this as an updated Greek tragedy, full of yearning and elliptical consciousness and DOOM in capital letters (also). It is forbidden love at its most primal, and the modern spin to the tragedy is that it was technological drive which set William and Maria up for their Sophocles-and-Aeschylus-style fall. Are all dystopias cautionary fables with a Luddite bent? Maybe. But only some of them are as classy (and classical) as this one, and even fewer let the softest of human emotions take center stage.
Sons of Mistletoe ... ABC Family ... 11 AM
When I had our children I didn't know much at all about parenting... being from a small family meant that I had little experience with babies... but I was sure of one thing. I wanted our children to share our love of reading. When they were tiny I would place rag books in their cots so they could learn the idea of a 'book', when they were old enough to listen we would read to them every night and as soon as they could grasp the alphabet we taught them to read. These days when I see the three of them together, when we are on holiday or they are at home in France, with their noses in a book I feel very content... I try and avoid the temptation to say, 'talk to me... stop reading... let's chat'... and as much as I crave their company, I am happy.
Create a card using the above sketch as inspiration. You're not required to use TE stamps to play, but there's a bonus prize if you do! To be entered into the prize drawing you must link your card using the In Linkz provided below by Thursday, March 22nd. And of course there are prizes that are up for grabs:
Are you seeing where this is going?
We were thrilled to see that the hole-in-the-wall sushi joint along the Sushiyadori that we mistook for Masazushi on our last trip was still there. Thanks to our friend W once again, this time we managed to find out that it’s called Sushi Gen.
So, it's May 2nd and I'm going to plan this to be my 'catch-up' month. NO NEW PROJECTS!!
And Christ? He had it coming.
The following types of incidents are reportable online.
Alice was stubborn and headstrong, and despite her mother’s refusal, at dawn she had made her departure from her house in secret, two hours earlier than her mother normally rose from bed. She would at least adhere to the warning she was given, and had been given since she could remember: “Keep To The Path. Do Not Stray From The Path.”
My good friend posted this yesterday and I though it was hilarious.
I recently finished reading the book “More Good News” by David Suzuki and Holly Dressel (more on the book in a later post). And at the end of the chapter on fresh water, there is a quote by Victor Munnik, a South African water policy specialist. He says:
Internet pornography comes in many form – nudity, live show, erotic dance, and anything the client want.
For those with heartier appetites, I serve the burgers on bread and add some toast with nutritional yeast cheese to the soup dinner. I also serve the breakfast bread with peanut butter.
Kept up the exercise routine, Yay! Fantastic ski on Saturday. The insanely sunny March weather is finally here. Cold nights, –15 or so, warm days, around zero, lots of snow for skiing and snowshoeing, and tons of sun….
Today feels like spring in Oslo. FINALLY. Glory be.
The gratitude was a hugely exaggerated but pleasant.
I'll continue
The third saying of Jesus as He hung on the Cross, living up to His Name, which was to save His people from their sins was to his mother and his disciple who stood by her. To the mother, he said “WOMAN, behold thy son!” and to the disciple, He said “Behold thy mother!” (John 19:26-27).
So, we explored the city she had left behind, stopping to pick up clothes for her Miranda, Toby and Jeremy at Kids' Gap, window-shopping in Yorkville and relaxing over glasses of wine, an amazing gorganzola gnochi and a range of appetizers, both healthy and hearty. We looked at all the buildings and commented on which buildings were still there and which ones had cropped up over the years. We even stopped in at a downtown hotel and had our picture taken on its rooftop patio bar, the CN Tower standing in the distance and the whole city lit up and on display just for us. A sweet man (I use the term man, but he was 15 years younger and yes, I would be a cougar) offered to take our picture and stay for a martini. It was tempting but I had to catch the last subway and she had to catch a cab.
I think we have good reason to be angry.
Happy Birthday Zack!
vapour
As the Worts start to lead the three unsold slaves
The website says "On Sky Digital and around the world on the Internet – this is Radio Caroline." And for two weeks starting this Friday 24th July between 1400 hours and 1800 hours GMT Radio Caroline presenter Jim Ross will play various tracks from the Magic Ship album 'LoveTel Motel' on his afternoon show.
According Katholieke Actie Vlaanderen (Catholic Action Flanders) there has come a schism in the Belgian Catholic Church. (See: Ketters in Vlaanderen = Heretics in Flanders) The accusation levied against those Catholic priests who are concerned about the decline of the Roman Catholic Church is somewhat strange. First of all those makers of the manifest do everything to keep the Roman Catholic Church on its feet in those turbulent times. They want the best for the survival of the Catholic Church in Belgium.
If you’re unfamiliar with these two charmers, a quick overview (with thanks to Jeremy at Good As You for the list of stories).
There is a fourth – “Passive Aggressive”
“What?” barked Grey.
And the police don’t seem to do anything to physically watch and catch speeding motorists. They would rather set up cameras and radar guns in 80 kmph zones to catch some poor unfortunate soul doing 85 and collect a fat fine from him or her. It is not really helping, because people who speed generally know where the cameras are and take their chances everywhere that they aren’t. The South African Police needs to wake up and start catching the real offenders. For instance, I have never once seen or heard of anybody being pulled up for changing lanes without indicating. Isn’t that an offence?? Doesn’t it deserve some form of punishment or fine? Don’t get me wrong. I’m not some goody two-shoes here out to get everyone else. But honestly, how hard is it to just follow the rules, indicate when needed, keep a safe following distance, be courteous to the fellow drivers, wear seat belts and so on? And speaking of safety belts, I personally know people who avoid wearing seat belts until either the car alarm bugs the heck out of them or the co-passenger (such as me) says something. Why?? What are you trying to prove? Who are you trying to impress?? Just wear the damn seat belt! It should come as a natural instinctive motion, shouldn’t it?… like brushing one’s teeth. But sadly it doesn’t. No wonder that the road accident death toll over the festive season in December went close to 1500.
Le Cirque tags 4500314
Credits:
With Logan’s departure as CEO, I’ve asked myself if I should continue with this list. And after much consideration I’ve decided that keeping track of our progress towards earning medals is indeed a worthwhile endeavor. As part of any good plan involves some sort of monitoring progress towards the stated goals. With Logan gone, however, I’m not sure if USATF as a body, or whomever becomes his replacement, will continue with the number “30” as the goal.
Meanwhile, Labour are campaigning against British National Party candidates in Heanor by proxy, by leaving ultra-left extremists from the Socialist Workers' Party front organisation Hope not Hate to distribute leaflets paid for by Mirror Group Newspapers and trades unions.
This photo was taking on the trail on an inn-to-inn horseback riding trip last summer. Traveling through the Luberon Mountains in Provence, France, we went through this really dark tunnel and this was my attempt to capture it.
Produce is finally starting to pop up at the local farmers' markets and I couldn't be happier! While my garden is doing fairly well, especially the tomato plants which have become too heavy for the cages, I don't have room to plant everything I wanted. On the same note, not everything I planted is thriving. Luckily we have some amazing markets to help pick up the slack!
Wrestle and love, you see
We were given air guns and catapults for our 10th birthdays.
As I calmed down, I suddenly realized that I still had an urgent call from Mother Nature waiting. Shaking, I peered into the toilet to make sure that the spider was still gone. Then I disrobed and slowly sat down. But as soon as I sat, I felt a tickle on the inside of my leg. At first, I thought I'd imagined it, but I felt it again. And as I felt it, a picture flashed through my mind- a picture of a zombie rabid wolf spider swimming up the drain, leaping out of the water, climbing up my leg and biting me smack-dab in the middle of the hootenanny.
isn’t it nice when someone makes your day? loverbean, of the blog lemon salt, did just that when she bestowed upon me a kreativ blogger award last week. how lovely! it is especially exciting to be recognized by someone you admire (even though we’re strangers), and loverbean is ever so admirable. if you love lemons and all things citrus, you’ll love her blog. if you love baking, you’ll love her blog. and, if you love soothing, fresh photos, you’ll love her blog. many thanks for the pat on the back, loverbean!
****Google is your friend.
Murder Song
It was time to refresh my memory. I loved the city but I felt it was quite unsafe, and if you don't speak French, forget about getting a job.
The morning after I land in Austin, Texas, I borrow a bike and set off in search of Krautrock. I’ve read that Amon Düül II made some interesting disco jams in the mid-nineteen-seventies, and if there’s one place in the continental US where one can find obscure, thirty-year-old, semi-funky German rock, it’s at Waterloo Records.
I did this picture for the upcoming book of my good friend Marion Montaigne, famous in France for a drawn blog she does about science, which is hilarious. Each time, a fake reader sends a question on a postcard and she answers it it the most funny and unpredictable way, based on real scientific facts but speaking in the name of her avatar, the mustached professor.
Note: if you are making this salad ahead of time, make the quinoa, fluff, and add the dressing while it is warm. When it has cooled to room temperature, add in the spinach, chick peas and parsley; toss, cover and chill. Before serving add the pears and toasted pecans. Taste test and add more seasoning if needed.
Before getting going on our list we stopped in at Bridgehead and fueled up/warmed up with some caffeine, soup and a sandwich. It was delicious - we love the B-Head.
to proclaim the Year of the Lord’s Favor”
1/2 cup Mayo
We in the United States like to think that we’ve gotten past this point, that we’re all capable of juding people “not by the color of thier skin, but by the content of thier character,” as Martin Luther King said. Obama’s election, we like to think, was the culmination of King’s dream. We’re past that whole racism thing, supposedly. So things like Trayvon’s death–they aren’t supposed to happen anymore. But they do, and one of them just got national attention. That’s why Trayvon’s story is now absolutely everywhere.
The first time I saw Paul Gross' Men with Brooms, it may have been a sanitized TV version (though Canadian TV doesn't usually do that), because I don't remember it being so scatological in its first half-hour. Potty humor aside, it remains a fun, offbeat sports comedy that treats curling the same way others treat baseball (i.e. as poetry). You can pretty much expect that odd Canadian mix of eccentric characters, zany humor and truthful, well-acted moments. I do think it goes overboard in its conclusion, which feels like a parody of the Hollywoodian "happy ending". But fun. And the three leads are people that are always watchable - Gross himself, Leslie Nielson and the soulful Molly Parker. The DVD has a short making of featurette and an archive interview with Gross that has nothing to do with the movie.
Fourthly, if you are the sort of parent who (as Sustain claim) finds the sight of sweets at the check-out annoying, may I suggest you fill in one of those comment forms the supermarkets so helpfully provide and do your shopping in a place that is more to your liking, preferably in a different hemisphere.
"That's the trouble with the Bellows family," says school bully Jess. "They're all brain dead."
Today’s students will be tomorrow’s citizens and leaders and they will deeply impact the quality of life in our communities. We owe it to them to invest in their future.
3. Hang clothes out to dry on the line instead of throwing them in the dryer
Blogging is time consuming and there is not a lot of extra time here.
like to have a head-to-head
Yet, it found time in May 2000 to accede to the Convention on the Prohibition of the Development, Production, Stockpiling and Use of Chemical Weapons and on Their Destruction (entered into force in 1997), and to bring the provisions of this convention into law.
The right contingent and the left contingent are equally vapid, using African-Americans as a uniform political symbol — at a moment in history when African-Americans are emerging in mainstream American perception as diverse in the same ways as Americans are diverse (thanks in no small measure to the emergence of credible black conservatives who successfully weather the storm of opprobrium from disgusted liberals and their own communities).
The outdoor scene was so gorgeous, with the hanging lights and humongous trees. You feel obligated to sit outside because the atmosphere is so serene and relaxing.
Here are some of my favorite pics of my girls (a few years ago). Can you see the resemblance to the Kaela girls in my project?
GAB’s Chairman Osama Al Faqih told the monarch that many public institutions have failed to heed the cabinet decision and set up in-house auditing units to ensure discipline and curb financial malpractices. “We are looking forward to your majesty’s support to enable the bureau to perform its duties properly,” Faqih said.
Today marks the American release of The Human Value’s Push And Pull on Pretty Mouth/Big Deal Records. Returning from a year in London with two UK releases and loads of successful touring and press.
It's hard to choose, but I think my favorites are...
No doubt this will prove popular with the public, who quite rightly perceive Islam as a threat to their traditional French values and culture. They perhaps believe that banning the veil will help thwart the growth of the most orthodox strain of what is an aggressive and oppressive religion, in their country. It is my belief that such legislation would be equally welcome in the United Kingdom, too, and Jack Straw's remark back in 2006, that the veil is a "visible statement of separation and of difference", suggests this is something our government may also consider.
8) Salt 2 teaspoon or to taste
Now on to the life portion. It will probably also include birthday stuff, just fyi. Apparently I'm not going in the order that my title suggests. Ah well.
"True." Their dad nodded. "We had to be careful. There are a lot of people in the world who would want to hurt us for the things that go on in Fletching. Like the gold making - everyone would want in on that. Having that technology creates danger. People will stop at nothing for the sake of greed."
Anyway, I shall leave it there.
Image - SCACD stamped in Memento Ink and Colored with Copics, Inky Antics Cloud Template for Background of Image
New opinion poll among Icelandic business leaders shows that 63.9 percent of them are opposed to the idea that Iceland should become a member of the European Union while 36.1 percent favour membership.
It’s still there gathering dust
Yes friends: It's a Volvo C-70 convertible. Isn't it drool-worthy? Yes. Yes it is.
After each explosion the people were left a little poorer, but the bankers got a little richer.
Can you believe that little monster tried to take my lollipop??
‘Truly, I say to you, as you did it to one of the least of these my brothers, you did it to me.’
6. Bake and cool.
The girls first enflamed the K-pop scene two years ago with their debut single, “Fire“, and since then they’ve been making headlines right, left, and center. The season will kick off with a special episode, and continue on with 21 distinct stories of their growth as artists and individuals.
Then the thing went down about 20 yards directly in front of us, and hovered directly in the middle of the road, and stayed there for probably 20 minutes or so, and it’d come on, and then it would go off. It was like it was playing a game with us. And this is typical of reports around the world.
PATRIARCH OF BROOKS MARRIED AT 63, NOW 92
Our memories center around preparation for the feast and the feeling of anticipating those who will be returning home to share the day with us. Once everyone is home, the real festivities begin.
As a matter of fact, "back in the day" two sport stars were a common occurrence on both the high school and collegiate levels. We still see standout performers in both sports in high school with such recent track and field standouts as Jeff Demps, Xavier Carter, Bryshon Nellum and Marquis Goodwin excelling on both the track and the gridiron.
In fact, known criminals will be voted into office because of a racial solidarity among the majority that doesn't exist among the whites. When Ian Smith of the old Rhodesia tried to stand up to the world, white South African politicians were among the Westerners pressuring him to surrender.
Every little detail helps, I tailor them the best I can. If you would like to join
it reminded me of many of alexandria's beautiful and thoughtful photographs of nature.
12 - serving with an amazing group of ladies on the MOPS steering team
I had defrosted some ground beef with the intention of making enchiladas but then decided I didn't want enchiladas again and I wanted to try something else. I looked through some books and finally opened one I had not opened very often before. The book had some pages doggie-eared and I opened it to the first one. Kufta Mishwiya. Bingo! Of course, I needed a starch because that's how we roll so I looked in the same book for a rice recipe. Rizz Mufalfal. The name of the book is From the Lands of Figs and Olives and I've had it for a long time. It is a book with traditional recipes from the Middle East and North Africa. This is probably one of the first cookbooks I ever bought so I've had it for about 10 years or so. I had not made anything from it yet and now I wonder what took me so long.
Today was a day where it kind of caught up with me. I got to work and my phone was ringing. I grabbed it and ended up listening to one of my favorite clients yell at me for about a half hour, and literally couldn't get a word in edgewise. So after I hung up the phone, I set up about trying to fix the problem I hadn't heard about before then. With every solution I came up with, someone threw down a roadblock. In the midst of this, the phone is ringing off the hook, emails are flying in by the dozen and people are IM'ing me every 20 seconds.
Publisher: HarperTeen
Heroes are deified, for a hundred pages at least
I'm sorry for the quietness this week (and last week too).. I haven't really been feeling like sewing so I managed to find little project that required little (to no) sewing (with the machine, not hand sewing).
Friday, we will all gather at the Courtice Area for a school skate as we finish our race! This is a great way to complete our winter term before we enjoy our March break for a couple of weeks.
No matter how much it hurts you, or makes you cry
It was better than I thought...
Moving away from the super serious previous answer- I like them raw with a little ranch dressing for dipping. I only like cooked carrots if they are in something else like a stew.
Pretoria, South Africa to Chipata, Zambia
Once the butter is sufficiently brown and smells nice and nutty, remove from heat and dump in your cocoa powder, sugar, water, vanilla and salt. Be amazed at how much it bubbles...then start stirring! Let this mixture cool for about 5 minutes...
Okay, Okay, I guess they don't really like to go to Socorro, but they do like to go to Bosque del Apache, which is near Socorro. It's one of their favorite vacation spots. They go there every year, and have been going for a very very long time.
Chocolate pretzels
Their solar calculations are renowned, too, with a system of years split to reflect numbers 13 and 20 still used by present-day Maya and many devotees.
Sunday night at Caerleon is Quiz Night. Helen Yendall and Christine Cherry set the quiz and ask the questions. They must devote a lot of time to this and always treat us to a good night. We split into teams of six. So why are there five of us here? That's because Simon Whaley took the photo. Our team's name was Whaley's Women and we came second.
Jung said that the trickster is a manifestation of our doubt, our sense of ridiculous, and the tension that we experience when two opposites are true simultaneously.
X-114: An 'experimental' IPA with an experimental hop that has gone mainstream. This is the one that hit my sweet spot. Super floral and citrusy with a nice malt and alcohol balance, it quickly became a favorite of mine.
1: Generally most of us audiophiles believe vinyl has better sound, a more soul reaching sound. Even after ripping it to digital.
While searching for the truth about her client, Addy’s job description gets hazier by the second. She’s not sure if she should be a lawyer who is supposed to present the facts, a juror who is supposed to determine the truth or a private investigator who is supposed to expose insurance fraud.
Closer "Don't Let me Go," another ballad with what is probably a cello in the background... this should've been on MTV's top 10 in 1986... sad, cheestastic: my inner teenager could not be more involved now....
Susan and a bunch of other Abnegation refugees are...already at the Amity compound.
Saying that the pay hike would lessen the burden of those in the lower income group, Abdullah said that at the same time, they should be mindful of the people’s higher expectations of the civil service.
1/2 cup unsulfured molasses
Yes so my blog is 2 years old right now!!! And to celebrate I made this blogpost with my 2 sweet friends Rbk Gossipgirl and Novalita Constantine who both blog @ The Rockin’ Chicas. It was a lot of fun girls! Hope to do a blog together again sometime soon. So I have been blogging for 2 years now and I love to see how I have changed. When I started blogging I was kinda ugly lol but well. I realy love the 2 years of pretty things in SL. The designers who inspired me with their amazing creativity and I hope I will keep being amazed by this all.
Powell’s
During a morning meeting, during one of those pauses, it was suggested that some people were too weak and might hold the expedition and its glorious purpose back.
KT: These are rather hard times for Greece and Europe in general. Do you think collaborations from European writers, such as the present anthology, might help forge a renewed sense of European identity and solidarity?
radicchio leaves
Here are a few from Hunter:
Anyways, while I was going through my wonderful stash of stamps and dies yesterday, I thought "What could I do with the Egg Dies that has nothing to do with Easter?" ... and with a little pinching here and a stripe-cutting there, look what you can create!!
We stayed in a small hotel in Oakland, which is a few miles from downtown Pittsburgh, and where The University of Pittsburgh is located. We were in a fourth floor room that had one window with a spectacular view of the mountains and Monongahela River. It was quite exhilarating to look out the window and see the river, the mountains, the bridges, the freeways, and all the cars moving along without a thought to the fact that those roads are being held in the air by nothing but concrete and rebar.
All your words are true; all your righteous laws are eternal.
And please, do see it on the biggest screen you can. It’s worth it. Usually the hype leading up to big blockbusters irritates me. This time, I was enthralled and yet, I expected to be disappointed by the reality of watching the movie. Now, I want to see it again and again.
Day 28: What I've Learned Along The Way
In the pacman game, if only to spend all the points in the track is very easy. Well, here the thrill, you…..[read more]
Why do this? You aren’t getting paid, and you might come away with nothing tangible. But it’s a chance to be inspired, get energized, talk to colleagues with years of experience on you, and maybe even score a job. If you don’t make the leap, if you don’t push yourself, you won’t evolve.
I went into reading The Fault in Our Stars blind. I had ordered it months ago, and I know I read the review at that time, but I forgot what it was about—I only knew that John Green wrote it and I wanted to read it. So I checked out the audio and started listening in my car. Had I remembered before starting this book that it revolves around a person with cancer I might not have picked up this book to read. You see, one of my good friends just found out that she has cancer and I wasn’t sure I was ready for a book featuring a terminal cancer patient. The universe works in mysterious ways, and the book that I thought was the wrong book at the wrong time turned into the right book at the right time.
Steve Jobs Garage, 2066 Crist Drive, Los Altos, CA
And that’s what matters, right?
28 oz purple potatoes
Exercise increases blood-flow and oxygenates the brain, so get moving.
When this darkness breaks to light
Ink: Black (Versafine), VersaMark.
(Use your spoolie brush (you can clean a mascara wand from an old mascara) and groom them upwards and trim any long hair sticking out of a spoolie with little scissors. There is a lot of videos on Youtube how to do that!)
This book was definitely the most interesting graphic novel I’ve read (sorry, Mr. Pilkey. You’ve been out-graphic’ed) for miles to come, with amazing illustrations, gripping adventure, heartfelt comedy, you name it. But the book did fall under the line not because of sloppy feeling, because of some of its element. There was…let’s just say, very inappropriate content, and some salty language along the way. A good book for preteens if they’re not very easily disgusted, but if this is how Bone started, I wonder how future installments were like…
“Sorry Mrs. Archer. Give him dry dog food. It’s really the best thing for Punky.”
Palaces for kings and queens, mansions for the rich
Why can't I be as emotionally strong as her?
I am sure that Sycamore View is not the only church to use that word in their bulletins or announcements. The reason churches use that word is not to deliberately defile the church. It is used out of ignorance in an attempt to be popular and hip to appeal to a wicked generation that no longer loves what is good but prefers what is evil. That mindset in and of itself is a sin. The church is not meant to be politically correct or popular with the world, nor is it meant to give man glory. Giving “Kudos!” or praise to people in church for their accomplishments is giving man glory. The church is meant to glorify the God of heaven and earth who sent his only begotten son to die for the sins of all mankind whose name was Jesus of Nazareth.
I worked on, and perfected this recipe with Kathryn from Get Cooking, as we were doing it for the all day Indian class that we taught a couple months ago. We were very pleased, as were our participants with the way it turned out. To add an exotic, unusual touch, I rimmed the glasses with my homemade chaat masala and splashed in a few lemons and limes. I love this drink, and as summer approaches, I am looking forward to having loads of it on the deck, perhaps enlivened with a cheeky dash of gin, what say?
But more than that, it made me think that I probably waste far too much time on guilt. If the mom in Little House got to do creative things and find joy in them, why shouldn't I? I am never going to make an entire quilt by hand because I have blankets, but may it is really OK if I teach a birth class or write a blog post. Maybe that can be MY creativity and I don't need to feel like a bad housewife for spending some time doing something I like.
Kendra's talk offered lots of food for thought - as the slides flashed by, my hands sought to capture a few of the lovely pebbles in the flowing stream of ideas. I was especially taken by the pieces from Convergence II, (I think that's the right exhibit) where the theme was making a piece of jewelry for a literary or historic figure. Beaded eye patch anyone?
As we passed the G.P.O. and continued down O’Connell Street, we saw the Millennium Spire, or as the tour guides called it, the stiletto in the ghetto. The official title of the spire is the Monument of Light and is placed in the center of O’Connell Street in the place that was once occupied by Nelson’s Pillar until it was destroyed by the IRA in 1966. The spire was commissioned when O’Connell Street was redesigned in 1999. One of the drivers on the tour stated, of course this being Ireland, the spire which was to commemorate the Millennium wasn’t completed until 2003.
When her father moves the family to Scotland so they can all start over, Riley believes her life couldn’t get worse––that is until the ghost of nineteen-year-old Ian MacKinnon catches her purposely cutting herself. An uneasy truce quickly turns into friendship, and soon Riley’s falling hard for Ian.
It will be interesting other teams come forward with new Inerter or linked suspension solutions. The only problem is few teams patent their design to allow us such insight to their design.
On Sunday, after working a full day on Saturday mostly in the dark – for reasons that will appear in a later post – we ventured out for a slow walk in the surrounding Northamptonshire countryside. As a county it is only familiar to the larger population of the UK as one which the M1 goes through the middle of. This is both fortunate and unfortunate, as it’s really very attractive and varied, but has stayed that way precisely because so few people actually stop to find out. Also passing through Northants is the Grand Union Canal, the longest in the UK. We went for a walk from Stoke Bruerne, a village almost entirely based around the canal.
Easy bloom replenish
I just wanted to share a couple funny/gross examples.
The sign said not to sit in the chair. Nap sat in the chair. Emperors do not take orders. They give them.
star-sprinkled
At some point (5:35?) there was a knock on the door. I thought it was some friends running the half but thought “WHY would they stop by?”. It was Chris! He got up at 3 a.m. and drove down to be race support.
Spread half of the remaining buttercream on the top and sides of the cake then refrigerate for an hour. Spread the rest of the buttercream over the first layer. It doesn’t have to be too smooth and even because it will be hidden by the chocolate fingers and the fruit.
The city has carried out a campaign to intimidate and vilify protesters, claiming that protests lead to violence. In fact, the main source of violence in the world today is the wars being waged by NATO and the US.
Wrapping up this wonderful day... too tired to even think, so instead I offer this wonderful throwback all the way back to the long forgotten year of 2010 with Koan Sound & Asa's brilliant atmospheric piece "Hesitation", released on Screwloose and available on vinyl here.
WHAT.THE.FUCK. I was beyond livid.
We planted tomatoes, radishes, a couple peppers, tomatillos, okra, watermelon, lettuce, green beans, cucumbers, spinach, basil, oregano, thyme, chamomille, lavender...I think that's all. We put in seven of these things! I did reserve one for zinnias so that I could have cut flowers all summer.
Support one another along the spiritual journey.
One can see and hear both the bravery of young Palestinian women, the brutality of the Israeli military and the complicity of G4S, a company which profits in terror and exploitation. G4S are, of course, a company which is responsible for many abuses against asylum seekers in this country.
Make topping by combining chocolate and oil in small saucepan; stir over low heat until smooth. You could also melt the chocolate in a microwave. Pour warm topping over cold caramel, spread evenly. Chill in refrigerator for 3 hours or overnight for the chocolate to harden.
Here's a little inspiration photo for you~
Any of you have amazing booming artists out there? What fun and creative ways do you encourage your little ones to let their imaginations run wild in the form of art? How about quick and easy DIY craft storage we can inspire from?
But I did change the dates too. Unfortunately, my parents places of employment make it kinda difficult. My dad can only take M-F...so that means we had to go Sat-Sat...and flights will be more $$. And my mom can't take any vacation in December. But she wanted to go at Christmas time. So we were going Nov 10-17th. Parks are all decked out by then, so it was good. Hubby did not have that vacation though. He can probably get it. At his job, vacation is assigned...you get it when they give it to you...and his vacation is actually the last week of Nov and first of Dec. So since it's just us, we switched it to then..and a Wed-Wed to save on airfare. If my parents can go..we'll just switch the dates back. No biggie. (Hopefully)
So when the ADA telemarketer calls you, don't send this toxic organization your money--and make sure that the people those who care about you are also educated enough to do the same.
Shmaltz Brewing Company (He'Brew) He'Brew Bittersweet Lenny's R.I.P.A.
The Future Craft exhibition runs from the 26th March - 24th April 2010 in the Mathew Gallery, Duncan of Jordanstone College of Art and Design.
Time to complete: ~10 hours (20 episodes of Dance Academy-this Australian show I just found on Netflix)
Slight pause before I hear more, “Who says you have to do it all? And why do you have to do it alone?”
05. Red
When I told him this he said, “Look, I’ve been to China four times and every time they have accepted my American Express.”
And our last dilemma from the letter: "I'm looking for the name of a legit company that can help me without costing an arm and a leg."
i could take singing lessons from her.
Please excuse the crappy pictures. I let my older kids take my camera out of town (I know, what was I thinking!), so I had to use a really cheapo camera that my daughter should have taken with her, but instead she has my good camera, arrgh!!
Chong Wong.
5. Young Guns
Preheat oven to 350*. Beat the cream cheese, egg, sugar, and vanilla in a bowl until smooth. Lay one package of the crescent dough into the bottom of a 9 x 13 greased pan. Pinch seams together. Evenly spread the cheesecake mixture into the pan. Lay the second package of crescent roll dough on top, again pinching the seams together. Brush the melted butter over the top, and sprinkle with the sugar and cinnamon mixture. Bake in the preheated oven until it turns golden brown, approximately 45 minutes. Let cool completely before cutting. Serves 12.
Malt: Weyerman Munich, CaraRed, CaraAroma and Carfa Special II malts. Rahr Pale
"At least we got the door open." Rel blinked Clearsight away; it would be no use to him now, and if he was going to end up in Wilder custody, he didn't want to go comatose from burnout.
Dean Cain ... Arthur 'Murph' Murphy
(6) confiscating of materials, tools and equipment mainly used in producing infringing products;
Scott Servais is another one of my returns from my coach/front office/broadcaster mailings. He is currently serving as Senior Director of Player Development for the Texas Rangers. I also targeted him because he was a former catcher!!
Here are photos of a canal in the afternoon and evening, and quarries filled with water. The quarries were carved out of the earth by the U.S. Army Corps of Engineers long ago, and now the serve as wetlands and wildlife sanctuaries.
Mainly for safety from anyone who knows me really well!
A crazy solid entry point from Eradicator Records if you still need proof positive to get on that larger format for a seizure inducing dose of...The Hussy. 4 colors still available!
If you don’t know anything about CHLY, please check out http://chly.ca/ and consider becoming a member or supporter. Membership is $20 per year, allows you to volunteer with a diverse community of interesting people, maybe have your own radio show, and allows you a vote at our annual general meeting. All current full-time students of the Malaspina (Nanaimo) Campus of Vancouver Island University (VIU) are already members – any additional donations, however, are appreciated.
I've received some nice cover letters. I'd get all excited, thinking this could be The One, only to be disappointed when I looked at the resume. I understand the need to stretch the truth a bit -- especially when you're new and don't have that much experience -- but there are impressive things in the cover letter that are NOT on the resume at all. Did they take it off because they didn't want to be repetitious? Are they even able to do XYZ?
The Flower
Let me tell you how that happened. After the morning session of Groundhog Day at the Grey Lodge, I went down to the market. Had a fresh slice of tomato pie at Sarcone's (and got a loaf of nice crusty bread), then got a scale for sausage-making at Fante's, then got inspired. I'm in DiBruno Brothers, just schmoozing, when I see Stilton cheese. Hmmmm...I got a recipe...so I got half a pound of Stilton, and added it to my Beefy Pub Bangers recipe, along with two big tablespoons of Kelchner's horseradish. The Pub Bangers recipe is beef (odd already), with bread crumbs, and with the Stilton and horseradish, this became the lambic of sausages: stanky, distinctive, and oddly attractive: a real lonely outlier of a sausage that some people just loved.
Username: The username of the account to connect to the webservice as
ICD probes accidental death during raid
After processing the food photos below, I suddenly realised that we really ate a lot of food that night! LOL!
one wisp of cloud drifting up,
Awesome is not a word. Not any longer. I refuse to use it as it has lost its meaning and, alas, must be buried alongside other non-words such as holy, groovy and daddy.
The blue paper is from Recollections. The others are from my scraps. The flower I crocheted and used a button for the center. The key is Tim Holtz and says "SECRET" on it and is tied with ribbon from my scraps. The letters for the rest of the title are Thickers from American Crafts. The picture is of my daughter and one of her many monkeys. She said she was bored this day!!
Enjoy the rest of your evening.
We sell tops, dresses, jeans, skirt, jewelry, and some shoes. Our target market is currently women 18-35, but we do have items for all age groups. We have plans to not only expand in the age demographic, but size as well. We would love for everyone to be able to host a party and earn great rewards, however, as a new business we have to take our time to grow. We have big plans for the future with a lot of growth potential. Come join us on this amazing ride and see how much we grow and what we become.
5. Who is the Chief Justice of the United States now?
"Eehhhhnnn."
and it's all to raise money for Motor Neurone Disease, which is something that possibly scares me more than any other disease.
Anyway - got to go get ready for work - boo for Mondays!
By the way, I got married in 1989, and I hadn’t seen those families in a very long time. Everyone still alive showed up for the wedding, and I realized how deep those connections were. I called them all my Other Mothers. It was true. I think Mrs. Lerman (also my grandmother’s maiden name), Mrs. Goldberg (an homage to Molly Goldberg), and Mrs. Rosen come from there—all the Jewish mothers.
Lord Dormir: That was a low blow.
I wasn’t going to say this because so many others are asking the same question, but after seeing this picture I feel I have to ask … Will these two be the new Edward & Bella? It may not be too far fetched a question since Summit Entertainment, the production company behind Stephenie Meyer’s Twilight films, is also behind Marion’s film. The picture is certainly reminiscent of Twilight pics. I’d say they should try to be more original, but on second thought, it was most likely intentional as they try to lure young adult paranormal romance readers into the theater.
Cut your loss, old Antaeus, half-buried in the sand-
Well, I prayed each and every night for many weeks after that. Asking the Lord to help me find my birth mother. That this was so very important for me. I needed to know her, I needed to find her and I needed to tell her that I didn’t hate her for giving me up !
I might see in those who needed to hear it.
The astrologers that were interviewed in our paper were a real hoot. It would be impossible to paraphrase the stupidity of these gits, so let me quote them (with the parenthetical, rhetorical italicized inserts being mine, of course)....
We tucked everyone in on our bedroom floor and Dennis booby-trapped the door with our laundry basket and ironing board.
Week 13 Change: -0
Now the manna was like coriander seed, and its colour was like the colour of gum resin. The people went around and gathered it, ground it in mills or beat it in mortars, then boiled it in pots and made cakes of it; and the taste of it was like the taste of cakes baked with oil. When the dew fell on the camp in the night, the manna would fall with it.
If you do come over, I promise I won’t ramble on about how I think it’s great that if you Google Monsanto, one of the first auto fill selections is “Monsanto evil.” Or how organic strawberries were on sale for 1.99 and I bought six pints and would have bought more if I didn’t feel that it would have required some sort of explanation at checkout. True story. I promise.
A half an hour later I took him to the emergency room. There they took a sample from his diaper and sent it off to the lab. 7 days later it came back negative. Seriously by this point he was on a ventilator and had already had his stroke so I have no idea how it came back negative. That's crazy in my opinion but I'm not a doctor so what do I know right?
And sure enough, they had put together this huge Mother's Day "Mother Pucker" project in a blog post titled "These Hookers are Taking Mother's Day BACK" (And even though it's over, you should still go read the post. Especially the chart at the beginning. The title says "hookers"....you know it's going to be great.)
Karl Endreson (Orange Crush)
The life snuffed out?
We have also set a day to get started on the fun DIY stuff, which is the first weekend in April, so stay tuned for the REALLY fun posts coming up in the near future!
The kids lined up, and it was time to test this thing out. Isaac was the first, and then we went by height. We got about halfway through the line up, and Zane Andrew busted it clean off the rope. It held up to a few dents and cracked in one place, it was actually the rigging that failed first.
This category draws on the traditions of independent artistic practice in that the entries will have no brief other than to identity and radically address important issues on a deeply felt personal level. However, we expect that, unlike most ‘museum’ art, it will generate genuine participatory relations with its audience and be able to work outside institutional sites and conventions. Participatory art and communication is the core principle of what we are looking for at Beyond…
Nightingale addition to the count and a Peregrine Falcon mobbing a Marsh Harrier over the Ramp. I also visited Restharrow at Sandwich on the way home on Sunday where I was able to Photograph a close Common Sandpiper as well as a Jackdaw and the odd Gull or two.
Same 2010 black boots
In a bit of a "blah", down-phase a little while ago, I filled my ebay watch list up with Warhol pop art. So the mini blue Liz and the mini red Jackie O were from there...
2:57: I send the girls to their beds for Free Reading Time and then get my shoes on so I can go run errands. I ring my neighbor's doorbell and she comes over to sit with the kiddos while I'm gone. I head off to the library. Normally I take the kids, but they've developed a complete amnesia regarding proper library etiquette, so I'm giving them a break from library trips until they can show me they are capable of behaving.
They in fact, were not, although Alice noticed that the moment she passed under the candid stare of the tree a deafening silence engulfed her. You might question how a silence can be deafening, but from the terrific noise and commotion from the weather that Alice’s ears had become accustomed to, the sudden instant that she crossed the threshold of the forest it silenced, causing her to jump and scream and look about as if the tree’s imaginary fingers had placed their hardened hands about her head. However, Alice was levelheaded and brave enough to regain herself. She shook her head and walked along the path that snaked suggestively through the forest.
I remembered my mom telling me of a time she was really struggling with anger towards somebody who had been mean to her. She talked to somebody who she trusted to give her counsel and that person, after listening to her story, recommended something unexpected.
“Whilst your offending did not involve any grooming, the element of coercion is an aggravating factor.
When the low moon begins to beam
This Wednesday, May 2, is the next posting for the Insecure Writer’s Support Group! I was able to clean up the list so we have a good core group of participants now. If you haven’t signed up, please join us!
is competent enough to be executed.
Likely - 6 miles a week/24 miles a month/312 miles a year
Doom.
· All registrants receive complimentary admission to Insomniac’s “Bassrush Massive” at the Orleans Arena featuring Borgore, Knife Party, Bassnectar, Datsik, Excision, Noisia, 12th Planet, Sigma, and Fury.
The irony of all these efforts is that somewhere along the line my boundaries for her won't be sufficient anymore. I'm beginning to realize that as we grow into adults many of us loose the boundaries that we were given throughout our childhood. Of course we live within legal, moral, and spiritual guidelines and those demanded by pregnancy, disease, food allergies, and other similar limitations but some of the simple boundaries taught by our parents are quickly forgotten when we taste freedom. Call it adolescent rebellion, ignorance, or boredom but we can easily loose our values when the sky is the
He also says "nine" but I'm not convinced as to what he refers to.
She has also put together a number of semi-complicated wooden puzzles that we have.
When we finished we did a half mile cool-down. By that time I had to hop on my bike and get home otherwise I would have stayed for the strength workout. Coach was herding people toward the monkey bars at the playground next door when I left. I'm bummed I had to leave! Although, my arms were pretty sore already (from the tetanus shot on Sunday and a killer gym class on Tuesday) so I suppose it's probably not a bad thing.
Crest 3D White 2 Hour Express 4 ct, Professional Effects 20 ct or Intensive Professional Effects 7 ct Whitestrips $1/1
- Chewing gum is illegal in Singapore.
Wow. What a beautiful song. Seriously, the vocals, the violin and the piano will pull at your heart strings. It doesn’t matter that it is in a foreign language, it is just really pretty. For something other than post-rock I had to include this song (I could’ve included anything I found on Virgin Bayblon Record’s site). Matryoshka is made up of track maker Sen, and vocalist Calu. Described as Modern Classical, IDM (although I don’t hear that in this song) and Ambient, Matryoshka are an awe-inspiring duo, who make some really pretty experimental work. Calu’s vocals remind me somewhat of the vocals of finish folk band Paavoharju, and it is really haunting stuff.
This week my youngest daughter Debs and I travelled to Yorkshire, picked up my mum en route to attend my Uncles’ funeral. A lovely man aged 90, who’d lived an extremely full & very active life. There were a few tears, but mostly we talked about him with smiles on our faces, knowing he was now happy, at peace and re-united with his beloved wife.
If you didn't notice, Mike's surname is mispelled.
many different designers such as LeLutka, MIEL, Sticky Fingers, DDL, etc…
Some of you newblings (as I like to call it) probably don’t know this blog and what the point of it is. Well, let me explain: this is a blog about my life; like my diary, except not in the girlishly way. The rest of the information you want to know about this blog and me is written down in the pages above this post like the About to start with. The posts I put on usually (which I have not been doing for awhile) are just like my writings in my little diary about my everyday life. So if you understand now, you may proceed to either keep on reading or to exit this blog (because this simply isn’t your taste of interest). If you still understand, I still implore you to check out the pages above, they will most likely help; if not, then just ask me straight away, I will be happy to answer your comments.
He was a she. She was soft and sensitive and scared. She cried a lot when nobody was looking. She couldn’t risk letting anyone know the truth about what was going on in her confused, conflicted mind.
There were several other vegan places, included a new vegan cake shop, that we read about but just didn't have time to visit. The Milwaukee area seems to be very vegan friendly and I'm looking forward to our next visit and more exploring.
Orange creme
He tries to set the picture back on the shelf, but it keeps falling over. So, we discuss the stand on the back of the picture frame and why it needs to be out to keep the picture from falling over.
Yordanova was born on 9th April 1953 and was raised by a Macedonian family. She graduated from Sofia University “Kliment Ohridski” as a bachelor in Bulgarian Philology. Till 1985 she was a literature teacher. In the 90s after the fall of the communism she had to choose whether to continue as a teacher and “suffer from starving” or have her own business. And she chose the business but not for a long time. When she was 40 years old she faced the truth that she was adopted when she was a baby.
Sloe Gin
There's this massage-bed-looking thing in the room!!!???
And, I don’t know . . . I kind of have the doldrums.
Great beer from a PA brewery.
I just smiled. I didn’t say a word. There was no need. After another minute or so, I finally spoke, “I’ll stay right here, and keep you company, for as long as you wish. And when you’re ready, then we’ll go back.”
Seen above is the newly released Samuel Adams Harvest Collection chilling with a couple Dogfish Head 120 Minute IPAs. Today's post is about the Sam Adams, not the 120 Minute IPA. Sorry 120, you'll have to wait!
The little time I do have I'd like to concentrate on my writing and my critique partners work. I hope you understand. Best of luck with your writing endeavors - Cynthia
This time, its gonna stay a while longer.
Music has figured highly this week as daughter passed her audition for a local choir and has continued to show enthusiasm for learning the piano. On Thursday she asked me could she play "Bohemian Rhapsody". No, not after two lesson sweetheart. But then I got the sheet music for Bohemian Rhapsody and I played the "bummmmm, dum, dum, dum" bit while daughter played the "tink, tink" bit. (You know what I mean, just hum the intro to yourself.) We could hardly play for falling about laughing!!
Until you start to consider the archers.
I showed them off to Tyler, who admitted they were awesome, but he had a minor stroke when he saw the price. Like I said, Tyler hates spending money, and he especially hates spending it on clothes. I said my goodbyes to the jeans from heaven and we walked out and headed toward the car.
I know the young man that loves her. He is my nephew.
and the truth about ourselves.
I am pleased to introduce you all to this week's Guest Designer, Eugenia Kovtun! Eugenia earned this Guest Designer spot for her win in the Tea Room during the Week #96 challenge - 'Vintage Boudoir'.
Designing to my heart's content.
That girl shouldn’t have had to move. What happened to her, shouldn’t have happened. Someone there should have stopped it. But they didn’t. They all laughed instead.
Gemma Halliday, Cindy M. Hogan, Elizabeth Spann Craig,
Any favourite wedding sites or inspiration you might recommend I check out? I've been gathering tons of inspiration and photos, but really, can you have too much??
there was brunch and breakfast pedis with the bestie.
I am back from my week off and loving the spring weather here. Lots of inspiration around me for design ideas. All of my flowers are popping up through the soil and, soon, the colors will be abound. I am starting off Monday morning with one of my favorite categories, Rainbow Chaser.
Here’s a photo of GM&O 103 as she looked a few years of filming. The unit is working an Amtrak train out of Chicago: http://www.rrpicturearchives.net/showPicture.aspx?id=2005687
He is only a boy
I’m having such a hard time coming to terms with where we are and what we’re doing, but I’m also so grateful that we’re all here and doing it, and that you’re doing it with us.
Interpretation: I know I’ll be happier doing something I love, throughout the process and at the end.
The new history club at Kings Lynn Library might be just what you are looking for – come in and ponder the past with others over a cup of tea. Use the Library’s wide collection of resources – photographs, school log books, newspaper cuttings and much much more.
The designation at Newtown Creek did not spur as much vocal debate as the Gowanus designation, but there is still potential for the label to have an adverse impact on the city’s hopes for economic development in the area, in Brooklyn and Queens, according to Marc LaVorgna, a spokesperson for the Mayor’s Office.
What plans do you have this weekend??
The clinks of trays getting cleaned in the kitchen continued, through the night. They walked in, they walked out, leaving stories that stirred me, all night.
But I wander in the places,
The islands have a home, it’s a little house. This house is 5,000 square feet.
Last but not least was ShoesieQ. I too opted for some red kitten heels,but this time by Lunar (£45), and then what are perhaps the most comfortable pair of evening shoes I’ve had the pleasure to pop onto my delighted tootsies by Audley. Not cheap at £175 – but worth every penny.
So Tyler Perry I will not be spending any money on your upcoming film Good Deeds, because I’m pretty sure I’ve seen it already. I much rather save my money for Hungry Games…
From my heart to yours,
With a growing army of admirers and fans all over the world, now is your chance to witness what all the fuss is about. Bouncing from the East to the West coasts and destined to wow audiences with their revivalist new wave synth-pop, Toronto-based quadruplet, Dragonette, are now embarking on a much welcomed four-date mini-tour this fall in the United States. With the pending release of their refreshing debut album Galore (I Surrender Records through Red Distribution) out on October 28th, watch out for their dirty electronica beats and synths, trunk full of hooks, neon-doused live shows and downright naughty delivery and vocals by the bands star front woman Martina Sorbara.
Despite Barcelona’s 4-1 win over Malaga, Jose Mourinho’s men hold a seven-point lead with two games to go.
Who cannot tell me what I wish.
I officially finish for the summer on May 10th. 4 months of heaven here i come. Well depending on whether i get a placement in a school for 2 months, which will occupy some time. I’m also going to Turkey at some point this summer, so that’s something to look forward to.
That we called our home
Walking Dead had it's second season finale tonight. We watched it, then we watched Talking Dead for the first time.
And this is my problem, how?
I know I am a few days shy of 4 months, but close enough! :)
...Dead Man's Curve, an aptly named 90-degree turn in the middle of the busiest section of the city's highways (yes, seriously, a 90-degree turn in a 60mph zone!). It's creepy and thrilling.
This doesn’t mean I condone over-filling your schedule. Trim the fat. Quoting one of my good friends, “Get rid of anything that isn’t useful, beautiful, or joyful.” That’s how to set priorities. Live that out and you find a little more time for the things that matter to you.
After the first in 14 different sessions that lasted approximately 40 minutes per session… the readings went from 07 BAD in the first session, TO 01 BAD after the 14th session.
While most artists are represented by galleries, there are many artists who wish to be in control and present themselves on the Internet. So the question is: What does an Artist need online?
I managed to schedule a class for geekygirl at 8.30am, and geekboy at 9. We managed to get out of the house and to the class on time too. Geekygirl was excited but a little dubious about what was to come. She had actually been to classes at this same swimming school when she was an infant and we were diligent, overachieving parents of an only child, though she has no recollection of this, of course. I had prepared her for the fact that she would be going in the pool with an instructor, not in mummy's arms, but that Geekyboy would be going in the pool with a parent. I felt how hard this was for her to digest this. It must be tough to be the older child sometimes, must feel like parental rejection to see the younger kid getting what seems like preferential treatment.
I so have enjoyed this journey of naming the gifts. Not of what I want, but of things I already have. As I've already alluded to... I will most likely continue to count, maybe not here, but in my heart and personal journal(s). It's been a wonderful, wonderful journey. I challenge you to consider the same.
Lastly I can say,
First I put about a quarter cup of nutritional yeast in a bowl, then I added a few dashes of onion and garlic powder, and 2 pinches of turmeric powder. Then I added about 2 tablespoons of butter, and a small amount of milk (maybe a quarter cup, or a third?) Stir until mixture becomes creamy; small lumps are normal. I then started adding dashes of a peppercorn medley and paprika, but despite the sauce having plenty of flavor, it just wasn’t doing it for me. That’s when I decided to add in about a teaspoon of pesto. I then microwaved it 30 seconds, poured it over some spinach fusilli, and voila! I have an alfredo/cheesy type pasta dish.
She also posted about being interviewed on ABC 33/40:
I guess everyone can tell what style of lolita I'm wearing to the prom, right? haha
Oh Natural History, I feel like this post either has to go on for pages and pages or I need to sum it up as “Dinosaurs and Hope Diamond.” I’ll try to strike a fine balance somewhere in the middle! This museum is one of the ultimate kid-friendly museum experiences. The exhibits range from the Dinosaur Hall (a little dated but still…its dinosaurs) to the gems and minerals (where the Hope Diamond resides), to the Mammal Hall and Ocean Hall and mummies!
See him surrounded by energy
AD : “Fine”
it was hypothesised, was the alteration of the balance of humours within the body; thus any treatment that induced vomiting or diarrhoea, was credited with purging the ill humour and restoring balance, hence the importance of purges and laxatives. And perhaps it wont surprise you to read that the most successful
Krylon is the nation's leading spray paint manufacturer and is number one in
My camera isn't working at the moment, so this is from my archives.
Funnily enough, I'm not really a bracelet kind of girl but things have changed. I used to wear a crazy amount up my arms during my teeny bopper phase, only for me to switch quickly to wearing none at all because well, they just got in the way. However my friend sent me the little friendship bracelet (so nice to receive mail in HK!) and I bought the plaited bracelet randomly. They go really well together but I'm tempted to remove the tassle because it's just going to get super dirty. Anyway, I'm back on the bracelet bandwagon.
Last week, I drop a Pipe Bomb about the Bella Twins not going anywhere in which I freely admitted I was wrong. But I will say that far as I concerned the Bella Twins will never be forgotten for what they accomplished in the WWE. Yes, Brie and Nikki struggled to find their place in the Divas Division as the division was full of great talent like Melina, Jillian Hall, Victoria and Mickie James. However as time went on and the Bella Twins both turn heel, they were able to find a niche for themselves in the division.
Presentations made, it was time to introduce them to the project. And we did. All it took was one look for each of them to decide where they wanted to go. Axelle and Elodie picked the women centre; Jonathan and Melissa chose Okhla and Francine adopted the special class.
This post goes straight to my positivism about ZA as I recall it, especially as a result of the leadership of Mandela. All of us in SA were influenced by his leadership and vision. Of course it rubbed off, and of course we were all ready to do our bit. And of course I still have bit of that old “Madiba Magic” in me today, as jaded as it may be…
Louis Abbot (LA): Yep, so we met and we started playing music together about six years ago in Glasgow, we all met at university. I knew John, the bass player, from a few years back and in some form or another we started playing some wee shows together as I started to write songs when I first moved through to Glasgow.
(For a little story about how my family and trout go way back, plus some tips on how to save your life if you find yourself choking on a fish bone, click here.)
To take this life you deemed unworthy,
I’ll gladly
I may not always love you
"I came here specifically, to ask you to just keep on working. You guys hear me? I want you all to keep working. Keep on achieving," Mrs. Obama said. "Just keep on using everything you’ve learned at Girls Inc. to pursue your dreams. Don’t waste any of it."
This is the best system around. Period.
We’ve watched Abby grow from a little kid to a young woman. She’s spent time at our home, hanging out with our daughter. She’s been with us, and an extended group of friends. We miss her and can’t imagine what our friends are going through with her loss.
They’ll win it all, right? Hanshin looks really tough this year. I think they’ll go for the title.
and the lack of 'real teaching' that is the consequence
At Paramount Country Club, par 37
i stamped a flourish then went over it in a glitter pen.
What can I do?
Then I piped a border of whipped cream on the perimeter of the bottom layer of cake, and then filled it and smoothed it with an offset spatula. Next came a layer of the sliced strawberries, arranged in neat rows.
A black-capped chickadee delights in the newly-filled bird feeder just out the morning window. Tea and birds, one constant in this life. Loving where you've landed doesn't mean you stop questioning, stop pondering the forks in the road not taken. We change our lives in seemingly benign choices, like making tea.
Then we, E and S met up at downtown, and after many miscelangelous happenings (including the bus driver that S already told you about) we somehow managed to get home. (read= my place.)
Your code is either native 1) machine code (compiled) or runs under another abstraction layer: (2. interpreted scripts or 3. virtual machine byte code).
10/03/11
The Long Island Power Authority shut down power to a church along Cornaga Avenue after the incident was reported. The utility believes faulty wiring within the building caused the problem.
In Maramures time seems stayed in place. In a land of unique beauty, traditions are enshrined, and the hospitality is touching. If you stop to admire the sun sign carved gate and the tree of life, the house will get one soon, giving you a pitcher of cold water or fruit bowl.
Recently, I find myself preparing many one-dish meal or one-pot meal for dinner. Should I blame the hot weather or just my plain laziness? I'm just not in the mood for cooking. So when I saw Ellena's Kimchi Tofu Soup, I decided to have it as a hotpot by adding more ingredients to the soup.
Several things went wrong:
We made it home past El Dorado Lake (which Kira says looks like Dr. Seuss did it). I dropped Kira off to pick up all three of my little girls. I was going to just take Emma, but nothing doing. They all wanted to go (Except Kira and Ben). They had to go to the bathroom, of course. Usually when we're about halfway through the store. Oh well!
And that's when I screwed everything up. I got depressed with my life and lonely and angry and completely withdrew from Luisito for the first time in our 10 years together. I pushed him far away from me and we almost lost each other, and when I think of how close I came to being alone without Mr. Blue and Luisito I feel gutted. When we finally started to patch up and fix our problems, we had to face infertility. The guilt I held for waiting for so long to find that I was no longer fertile was almost more than I could bear.
Instead, I was in the hospital. I had caved under stress and had the same friend who took me for my MRI – let’s call her B. – take me back for this nervous breakdown. I was checked into the hospital as such and pushed around all over the hallways. Unlike most hospitals, however, this one was filled to the brim with cats. They were very therapeutic to me, as one could imagine. I love cats.
I find the irony slightly amusing.
Lemur: Zoos
Here in Connecticut, a clear difference can be seen, for instance, in the debate over gasoline taxes. We have the highest gas tax in the country, now about 67¢/gallon (combined state 49¢, federal 18.5¢) and heading higher, yet Hartford Democrats cannot bring themselves to allow anything but a temporary cut. This is a party-line vote, pure and simple; Repubs wanna cut, Dems say no.
skin - antique linen, frayed burlap, tattered rose
I have used multi-threading to call gtk.main() because if I don’t do that, my program will be stuck untill, gtk.main() doesn’t end. It doesn’t end untill gtk.main_quit() is explicitly called.
One of the two students wounded during yesterday’s police raid at the university campus reportedly died in hospital today, bringing the death toll of that operation to two. Something tells me my anthropology class won’t be meeting this week.
"Again among the tiers of shipping, in and out, avoiding rusty chain-cables frayed hempen hausers and bobbing buys, sinking for the moment floating broken baskets, scattering floating chips of wood and shaving, cleaving floating scum of coal, in and out, under the figure-head of the John of Sunderland making a speech to the winds (as is done by many Johns) and the Betsy of Yarmouth with a firm formality of bosom and her nobby eyes starting two inches out of her head, in and out, hammers going in ship-builders' yards, saws going at timber, clashing engines going at things unknown, pumps going in leaky ships, capstans going, ships going out to sea, and unintelligible sea-creatures roaring curses over the bulwarks at respondent lightermen, in and out - out at last upon the clearer river, where the ships' boys might take their fenders in, no longer fishing in troubled waters with them over the side, and where the festooned sails might fly out to the wind."
An old friend once told me that you search for yourself in your 20s, you discover yourself in your 30s, and you define yourself in your 40s. I'm looking down the barrel of 40, and I haven't figured out who I am yet.
6-6:30 Make end of 4th grade celebratory pizzas for son and friend (our school doesn't finish until next week)
Note: The Electronic Design Process Symposium being held in Monterey will devote an entire day to 3D IC manufacturing and assembly topics. That day is April 6. You can find out more about the event here.
Grab the Chex Mix, the hot cocoa, and the fruit salsa and cinnamon tortilla chips and a stack of movies and your blanket and get the night started.
Yea, a snow day. I am enjoying our first snow day of the year, yet at the same time thinking about all those things I needed to do today to get ready for Valentine's Day. I had put together a survey to use after we have read the book "Froggy's First Kiss". Hopefully I'll have the time to slip it in somewhere tomorrow
in Houston (southeast TX-area): Contact 915-471-9840 or 214-276-3172 or bj1skinner@yahoo.com to foster / adopt both bonded dogs of deploying soldier: 6-yr.-old, female Dalmatian-mix “Sophie,” who has loads of energy & needs lots of outside play; & a 9-yr.-old male Shepherd-mix “Bear,” who just wants to lick your face & be petted all day. They have been together for six years, & I’m not sure if either of them could handle being separated from each other. I would prefer they stay together. They are both spayed, chipped, current on all vaccinations & healthy. I am in the Army, & I will be deploying with my wife overseas in two weeks. Because I cannot guarantee that I will be able to live in a place that allows big dogs, I think it’s best to find foster care or new permanent homes.
6. If you are planning to bring a bus or RV they must be kept out of our industrial park to allow emergency vehicles access (police order).
11. Bamboozled By Love (5:26)
God looks to the one who humbles himself. God wants repentance and God wants us to love one another. Not sit there dressed like Ahab and Jezebel in royal purple gushing and giving thanks to Babylon for how great and successful and rich you are.
The real coward or dishonest spin doctor is Farish himself that refuses to face the below facts that have led to the symptoms Farish has complained about here, education, language and mainstream society, faith segregation :
Are they alive? Davie is drawn to Stephen, to this power he has, and other things fall by the wayside. The pretty girl, his best friend. But the war with Martin "Mouldy" Mould only escalates. Stephen's answer? Create a man of clay to take care of Mouldy.
10. Ice-cream or popsicle stick?
1. Describe what you need in as few terms as possible. There are many different ways what you are looking for can be written a website. Since the goal of each word in the query string is to further narrow the result, each additional word you use will limit the returns. It could also eliminate a lot of useful resources because it will take the query very literally and look for it exactly.
"He was a hero to some, a villain to others, and wherever he rode people spoke his name in whispers." - John Albano
“Before you go” Charles requested “Can you…lose the wig? I’d prefer to draw you in all your natural beauty”.
The move towards detention regulation is also supported by OOIDA who has always contended that detention time was the most common cause of loss of revenue and violation of HOS regulations by drivers.
One of the places that I enjoyed watching birds doing what birds do has always been the Glenmore Reservoir. Even before I made the transition from photographer, to nature photographer, to serious birder, it was always somewhere that I could find something interesting and inspiring to shoot. This week was certainly no different.
I am not sure that outside-all-day, berry-picking, lost-in-the-woods, be-back-by-dusk childhood is all that common anymore. Maybe that is why the childhood obesity rate is 16.9% and why it isn’t uncommon to see seven-year olds with Iphones. What a strange world we live in.
And if somebody else ends up writing your query, make sure they are good at it!
People who know the story of France much better than I (that would include the FB profile Luis Infante, he is very good on Spanish kings of any medieval kingdom) can in similar detail trace every step between St Joan of Arc and Henri IV, and so get back from him to her without insecurity, though I rest my skipped knowledge on other peoples' more detailed one.
Well, I'm awfully sorry, I did always say the welfare reform bill was very, very, long and very very complicated.
A lot of the methods are ingenious, such as using a south-facing brick wall to create a warmer environment for some of the more tender fruits. Other contraptions, like the glass tube above, were purely aesthetic. The master of the house would only want straight cucumbers to serve his guests, so each individual fruit would have its own guide.
(And when the Sherman Oaks location opens in April, which I am so excited about, I will have another option close to me and be able to hit up either one on my way home from work - yes!)
Research is one of my favorite things!
“I never knew you existed.” He stared into his merlot. “I apologize for that. If I’d known, I would have found you.”
I heard someone say "Hey I built a bridge for you...now GET OVER it!" I kinda like that. So that is my plan. To get over it.
In amongst the boiler-plate sociological techniques suggested are some workshop exercises where staff are brought together and subjected to variants of the discredited and unethical Delphi Technique. There is a gratuitous graphic of 'social influencers on children', a handy decision tree about factors in human behaviour and potential tools to change it toward desired ends including naming and shaming, limiting access, automatic enrolment, taxes, regulation, forced choice and fines. These people are sick, and they are making other people sick with their vile indoctrination.
Even as a by-the-numbers action/adventure film, The Mummy manages to pull off a few things that so many other films don’t. The story, for all intents and purposes, is interesting and completely coherent. Its characters are quirky, fun and memorable, especially Rachel Weisz and John Hannah. But best of all: there’s rarely (if ever) a single moment you aren’t entertained to some extent. The Mummy is just a wonderful popcorn flick with enough substance to help it stand higher than most of its siblings.
"Oh, is she short? I was talking about her boobies. Bebe, you got the big D's like she does. You got the nice body, why you hide it under big t-shirts? Don't be afraid to let it all hang out? You wanna see my snake?"
Thanks so much for visiting The Cheat Sheet, a blog that (briefly) chronicled one panicked undergrad’s journey into life after college. I’ve moved on to a more permanent setting, so if you’d like to read what’s gone on since graduation, click here. Thanks again for visiting and I hope to hear from you soon!
It was a wonderful start to our evening, but quickly turned south. As our food was delivered Natalie came to me and complained that her stomach was hurting. An older young lady in our party offered to take her to the ladies room thinking that may be what was needed. Upon returning, it was deemed that was not the issue. On the verge of tears and upset, we prepared to leave. It wasn't quick enough though as she began to get sick. Poor Natalie had a mixture of emotions running through her face, embarrassment, hurt, fear of not being able to go to the dance.
You're right, Jen. He smiled. Problem easily averted and a successful shopping trip was had by the two of us. It actually wasn't a battle at all, the crowds weren't too bad, and we found everything we needed. Even if we didn't stop at the Ann Taylor Outlet Store.
Well it has been 2 weeks since The Squirrel & The Fox went live with our first challenge, and what a busy time it has been. We had over 200 entries and have been busy checking out all the blogs of those who entered. I must say it has been so much fun!!! But I am glad we have some new DT members to inspire us also.
Although it seems arbitrary, the mention of women and the roles they played in the Scriptures are crucial to understanding the roles they should play today. We should ask questions as the conversation of complementarianism and egalitarianism is still in process. One day we will come to the other side of that conversation. In my opinion, we will challenge the language of both sides and come to a third way of understanding it.
.: Your living is determined not so much by what life brings to you as by the attitude you bring to life; not so much by what happens to you as by the way your mind looks at what happens. Circumstances and situations do color life but you have been given the mind to choose what the color shall be :.
- scrape this into a pre-greased and lined 25cm spring-form tin, sprinkle with the sliced almonds and bake in the oven at 180c for 45mins or until golden and risen
So while little Rosco goes and hides in the poison oak we will do:
Suite de la série "Ciels de Décembre". Étape 5/9. Les explications sur cette série sont disponibles sur le site à la date du 14/12.
That visit turned into a relationship that has lasted over 25 years now. Our first 'date' was October 12, 1985. We got engaged in December of that year and then we got married the following December. I think we actually saw each other face-to-face about 30ish days in that year. It was brutal because we didn't have the social media, email, Skype, cell phones, etc. that exist these days. I still have all of the letters and cards that he send to me throughout that year.
I thought about this one for a second, but realized that I needed to drop a player in order to do the deal and the players I would have had to drop were more valuable than the players I would be receiving. I like the idea of trading Lohse, but Jansen doesn’t have a closers job lined up and Harper will likely get sent down in a week or two.
Join 145 other followers
I watched as a generation took a stand against war. They took a stand against how business was being conducted and what was being done to the planet. There was an innocence in that movie. The rapture that everyone felt as they partook in what is likely one of the most poorly planned events ever, and yet one of the most successful in terms of the number that gathered. That everyone just chilled and got high and got into the music, that was cool. I found it funny when the MC was warning the crowd about some bad acid that was going around.
Moishe
Into my hips
Hip Hip Hooray $12.00
Grace of My Heart (1996) is Allison Anders’ unabashed love letter to three decades of popular music, from the doo-wop era of the late 1950’s, to the rise of girl groups in the 1960’s to the psychedelic era of the 1970’s, all seen through the eyes of a female songwriter cast in the mould of Carole King, among others. Anders’ passion project finally gave a substantial role to character actress Illeana Douglas who, finally freed from the shackles of numerous supporting character roles over the years, delivers a career-defining performance. Despite the pedigree of having Martin Scorsese as executive producer and the likes of John Turturro and Matt Dillon in supporting roles, Grace of My Heart was not a commercial hit, and was quickly eclipsed by another nostalgic look at popular music from the ‘60s that came out the same year – Tom Hanks’ That Thing You Do! (1996), which, incidentally, wasn’t a huge hit either but had much more advertising muscle behind it. For all of its flaws, which include a weak third act, Grace of My Heart is a fascinating look at a time when the craft of writing a good song mattered. It is a film that deserves to be rediscovered.
My step mom and I go the the beach almost every day. They have the best beaches here on the island. I almost don't want to say the name because so many people come here already. It is sad that our secret is out.
Finally, it was time for the knights to come out. They all trotted out one by one, and the last to appear was the red knight.
Nokia Car Kit CK-100
What could be better for duck or drake?
So when times are hard and life is rough,
Cricut Birthday Bash
As always it is necessary the you; the borrower receive a benefit from the transaction to qualify for the Refi Plus; Home Affordable Refinance.
08/02/2010 BUY 0.01 xauusd 1179.11 08/03/2010 1188.13 +9.02
Pipo Crème
well not quite so successful...but that's ok!
Pin It I am so behind on my posts. I am trying to work things out with my little time. It's been hard for me to swatch, then edit my pictures, then post and write on my posts here. Life has been super crazy busy.
Man, oh, man. I practically STOLE this machine.
Deschutes Brewery was founded in 1988 and has built a reputation for making some of the best assertive beers around. Hop Henge, The Abyss and The Diisident leap to mind. So a beer like Chainbreaker White IPA, with its subtle touches and bright flavors is refreshing twist.
Any thoughts on Lena Dunham's show, GIRLS?
Mile 2? 8:57.
Then wait in His presence seeking His face, the reward in His hands are strength and grace,
Senator Perkins has requested Governor Paterson to declare a moratorium on eminent domain until reform legislation is passed. Here is some of what said in his opening statement to the effect that something is seriously amiss in this state when it comes to the conduct of our public officials:
11:40 - the waiter begins clearing deserted tables.
“I’ll drop you off on the strip and pick you up around seven okay?”
Not everything happening is God’s will. But God’s will for us in whatever situation is to give thanks and it becomes part of God’s tapestry for His marvelous plan for our lives.
This from last week which I didn’t get around to posting…
Example: Montage of past Purdue quarterbacks. You: “Remember Kyle Orton? He’s back… in pog form.”
“No, Mr. Doyle. Your file is full of boring stories because they all end the exact same way. Lack of evidence.”
EMOTIONAL EDUCATION is stressed at the Blue School, a private school in Manhattan founded by members of the Blue Man Group in 2006. Now with 200 students in preschool through third grade, according to The New York Times, "the school has become a kind of national laboratory for integrating cognitive neuroscience and cutting-edge educational theory into curriculum, professional development and school design." Making kids aware of emotions supposedly helps the academic education process in the school, which is largely child-centered. Read the article.
I have two little yam seedlings planted on the ground. One of it was dug out and guess what they did again? The flies had another party!
ODIs- 187, Runs- 6721, Avg- 47.00, 100s- 11, High- 189*
7. What college/university are you hoping to attend?
we record to watch without commercials at an hour when I can still keep both eyes open
Year of Release: 1975
The things that bound us together in high school no longer existed. We didn’t cheer together. We weren’t class officers. We weren’t in the senior class play or planning social events for the student body. We were no longer the big fishes in a little pond but little fishes in very big ponds – and the ponds were worlds apart.
5. Above all, have fun - and be inspired!
I can't wait to take her back!
Next year it is really important that we plan properly, we will have 3 spaces to plant up, and ideally we don't want to spend a penny on seedlings and plants because we haven't planned properly. If we use saved seeds and the ones we already have then it will be much more cost effective all round.
Now as to whether steampunk is "that in" - that is certainly the impression I get when I talk to B&N and Borders. But I'd say that rather than being a subgenre, we'll see it as a spice you can choose to add to the mix, as the Tchaikovsky books do, which is why I am perhaps interested in so much that touches on the edges without the Victoriana, which I was hesitant to approach head on. That being said, the Mark Hodder book just rocked too much not to publish. As did they all.
A very popular form of tomato for cooks and canners is the paste tomato. This kind of tomato has a lower water content, so it will cook down into a thick sauce faster than other types. Though I don't currently have a favorite, often people will like San Marzano, Opalka, and Amish Paste.
That vision statement worked well for the company despite a fall of 2% in total industry volume, Nissan sales in 2009 increased to 29,683 units from 28,313 units in 2008, which was a 5% increase.
Talk to you from LA
Descending the first major hill wasn’t easy too, for me. I didn’t want to switch to free gear, which I assumed would make the next climb more difficult, if I wanted to keep the momentum. I had to control my pace. Returning to the T-junction, we ran straight ahead towards the other direction of the Persiaran, which would ultimately lead us to Puncak Jalil. Here was THE killer slope, which looked frightening, even if one was driving. This was the absolute challenge, I thought. I tried not to look up, and focused on the dividing white lines on the road instead. The killer slope actually consists of a few smaller slopes, which made the climb even more difficult. Reaching the end of the first slope, we had a couple of seconds to catch our breath before continuing to ascend the second slope. And this vicious cycle would continue. After a while, one would lose interest in counting the number of slopes and just wished the race would end soon.
Ladies if you’re dating a Liverpool fan, you’re the luckiest women. Even if you don’t think you’re pretty (and probably aren’t very) he thinks you’re the world.
For now I hope you enjoy and leave comments and suggestions.
I took a liiiitttle bit of a break. But I'm back. Good times?
With His presence comes a real sense of contentment that is found only in Him.
Gianni’s life isn’t all that bad. He lives nicely even though is pension is exhausted, and his Mother spends her money both foolishly and unwisely as if there’s never a thought of preserving some of the estate. Lots of retired folks would trade places with him. And the sun will come up tomorrow.
It was nixed by the commander. Apparently, she didn't want an audience.
These will give me some MAJOR savings while shopping for the holidays with 4 kiddos:)
When these trees were alive, Glasgow’s climate was hot, damp and steamy. The trees grew in a tropical swamp similar to today’s Florida Everglades. After the clubmoss trees died, their interiors rotted, leaving them hollow. Gradually sand and mud carried by huge rivers buried the tree stumps and the sediment around then completely enclosed them, eventually turning into sandstone. Millions of years later, molten lava from volcanoes was forced between these sandstone layers. The lava cooled and formed whinstone, and this hard rock layer protected the fossil trees from erosion.
Giveaway open internationally! Be sure to enter below!
Yauch, who is survived by his wife, Dechen Wengdu, and their daughter, Losel, wrote a letter to his bandmates and fans for last month’s hall of fame induction: “I’d like to dedicate this to my brothers Adam and Mike,” he wrote. “They walked the globe with me. It’s also for anyone who has ever been touched by our band. This induction is as much ours as it is yours.”
Lemon Ice is easy to make at home. While it might not hold the thrill of sneaking a sweet treat in the middle of the long drive to the eastern side of the state, it is still satisfying and refreshing. It's sweet, yet tart flavors would be an excellent ending for a great spring or summer meal. Make some blueberry sauce to drizzle over it, and don't forget to invite me. :~) Ice, Lemon Ice, is for me to enjoy On My Plate anytime.
Now, if this bailout is so awful that even the BBC can see it, and we know that the "colleagues" include amongst their number some extremely bright cookies, the fatal weaknesses of the deal must be obvious to them as well. So who are they trying to fool?
As for what is commercial – all one needs to do is look at the big successes – think of The Da Vinci Code, Harry Potter, The Twilight series, The Hunger Games. Commercial, by any other name, is a best-seller, and if the supermarkets and big chain bookstores are driving what is to be published then there’s a pretty clear recipe.
Level: Clr 3, Drd 3
The very fact that Jesus uses (in the same sentence) the words evil and good presents to us a paradigm shift just as much as it did to the law obsessed Jews he was speaking to in regards to what defines a person’s Spiritual status. It is so difficult not to define a person’s goodness, spirituality or closeness to God based on their deeds. If they do good things then they must be good people. Every other religion would affirm that notion. But Jesus, in this one verse, turns that idea on its head.
And the aim was to:
The pronounced lemon-pine character of rosemary goes well with olive oil and Dijon mustard, giving this grilled chicken a rustic Mediterranean flair.
Logic would suppose that the more a given people resembles the English, the closer their version of 'liberal English democracy' should be to the original. Dutch democracy functions quite like its English cousin, for example. Italian democracy a bit less so. Indian democracy much less so. And Arab Muslims?
Locke-"I'm not sure what it's gonna be yet, James. When the time is right, it'll tell me."
ROTARY WING
Baekhyun-ah happy birthday~!!!!
Brouwerij Westmalle (Adbij der Trappisten van Westmalle) Westmalle Trappist Tripel
Impossible to choose: 1 vote; 5%
By Chris Heath
I’m really late posting (and still haven’t posted pics of our trip to Jackson Hole a few weeks ago since I don’t have the pictures!) but I ran the Top of Utah half marathon last week and I can’t believe I did it! In a million years, I never would have thought I could have run for over 2 hours straight! But I did it and it was a great experience and I’m so glad I did!
He said it was incumbent on families such as the former slave-owning Douglas-Pennants (who were in fact JEWISH), from North Wales, to do their bit to reverse what he called the “atrocity” of the transatlantic trade.
The doors stay closed,
“Yes! Let’s go!” Creme hastily stood up and started to run off, but Elise caught her arm and managed to tag along on their way to the Keep.
All well and good, I suppose. After all, tattling to teachers for an innocent comment seems a little excessive. But how about an apology from Little Emma? Not to Brownback, he is a politician and a public figure and needs to be told on a regular basis that he sucks, so as to not swell his head, but an apology to her Twitter followers is in order. After all, she lied. Emma did not tell Sam that he sucks, no matter how much she was thinking it.
I'm pretty sure I haven't worn black in ages bar one day so i've probably already achieved this but this is the official tracking. lol!
SECTION 3. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the State Board of Elections shall certify the amendment to the Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment so certified among the permanent records of that office.
Getting mail is serious business for me. I exchange letters with my cousins, participate in the odd craft swap, and just this year I started getting a magazine subscription again. I've gotten a variety of magazines in the past: American Girl, Bon Appetit, Gourmet, and Nylon. American Girl I grew out of (like ya do). Bon Appetit discontinued and I just didn't bother getting Gourmet again. They seemed fluffy, more like a food version of Apartment Therapy than a serious food read, though I enjoyed them regardless. Nylon lost my interest after 2 or 3 issues and the realization that I didn't really care that much about fashion, trends, or the people on the covers. Simple disinterest all around really. Not getting magazines in the mail wasn't creating some giant gap in my life, but it's convenient and a bit exciting to have reading material sent to your door every so often, at the very least it fills the gaps between books and seasons of Doctor Who.
noon. I own these kitties. Check out the kitty food. Momma kitty does not like that. Ouch, my nose! Yiiiiiiiippppppe. Yiiiiiiiiippppppe. Large human comes out and pets me. I am so happy to see her. Where did all my bones go?
Whilst you're eagerly awaiting its sequel, Pandemonium, out in March, you can read Lauren's amazing short story, Hana. It's told from the point of view of Lena's best friend (who, you might have guessed, has some secrets of her own…) There's a shocking twist to her tale that will leave you with your heart in your mouth. The short story is out exclusively in eBook this Christmas - it's available to buy for just 99p for a limited time only over the festive season.
Thanks to everyone who has come by and commented. I really appreciate each and every one of you. I'm so looking forward to painting and posting regularly again.
Gods will continue to get palatial dwelling houses, erected on the bones of hungry masses.
Lewis Schaffer: Famous Until Free Andrea Kenner Kinnard
5×7 set of Animal ABC Flashcards
You greedy little--! Fine, your world now consists entirely of Six-Flags and here's a free-pass that is good for all rides until you leave - which you NEVER can! Mwa-ha-ha-ha!. Hope you like roller coasters!
The application included evidentiary information from numerous excellent documentaries, which would be used as evidence, which any of the Justice’s could access – links provided to Youtube – to determine the quality of their evidentiary information related to Johnstone's Concourt arguments.
This is our last post of the Hoof Cafe, although we will miss it so dearly, we're excited to try out the black hoof and BHCO soon!
I added a seam binding bow in baby pink, topped with a little fabric flower and a pearly brad, and a little corsage of paper flowers that I have had in my stash for ages, tied up with a little bit of black baker's twine.
This was my dream
PM, pulling a PNM and offering more handouts to poor, old and unemployed….Free Water and Lights.
Released November 24, 2011 (Melbourne/Adelaide); December 1 (Sydney).
After trying out cooking with some of my MIL's virgin coconut oil, we finally went for it and purchased some ourselves!
Self: “Well if she objected to me typifying her as a woman in a hat, what can I do?”
- My pie/cake stayed in the oven for about 50 minutes, at which point it was a lovely golden brown.
Murder my sleep with revel;
DST, otherwise known as Daylight Savings Time.
In other words: “The search of a particular and distinctive characteristic.”
We lay there lazily, drunk on the taste of each other’s juices, and after a minute I looked down at the vision of her lying quietly, her eyes closed, her breath slowing, her lips like sugar holding my cock tenderly as it dwindled to soft flesh.
Forgive the use of a cliché here, but one can’t help but think of hapless deckhands shifting chairs around the deck of the Titanic. This week’s stock market selloffs come as no surprise.
With Cristiano Ronaldo as their undisputed star, the Santiago Bernabeu side have dominated the Primera for much of the campaign, and they opened up a 10-point lead several weeks ago.
The affidavit referred to the financial effect poaching had on the game industry, requiring the employment of guards and extra security measures.
the Bordering on Romance stamp set. I made a few changes and change the colors. I used the circle diecuts and kept my background white. Hope you like it.
This chapter made me stop and think about *which* activities we were choosing. As a result of reading it, I firmed up my inclination to drop ballet. We now do taekwondo as a whole family, all together in class (mom and dad too). I will make sure each child has some team sports experience, but we're going to focus on taekwondo and orienteering, both of which teach life skills, can be done throughout your life, and involve our whole family together. (This does not mean you should choose these activities. I'm just showing how we thought through this.) We also do 4-H, which all the children from kindergarten through the end of high school can participate in, and in which we parents can be very involved. 4-H allows us to incorporate many valuable life skills, plus the children get experience managing the meetings themselves. (CM talks about the importance of the self-management aspect somewhere, but I can't now remember where. I think it was probably early in Volume 3.)
One artist's partner is an art gallery owner so I asked him to start writing in the visitors' book. He put in a clearly written name and surname all in capitals, plus legible address complete with postcode.
Hayward is the type of player that just is a football player. He makes plays, is smart, instinctive and will be a really good fit in the Packers defensive secondary. He will come in and battle for time with Davon House or even allow the Packers to move Charles Woodson to a Safety spot at times depending on who the are playing and what sub-package Capers wants to use.
Sreekumar says that at the end of the session, belief is that Devi comes, blesses all the men who are dressed as woman, and makes their wish real. For more information on this celebration, you can go through the detailed post written by Anu from Sincerely yours.
Sabina, getting ready to leave for an obligation, took a moment drink me in. I was bedecked in shorts, my hikers, a pullover, a t-shirt, and my camouflaged cap with a lizard stitched on it. I was placing things in my pack and it really was no secret what I was doing; a walkabout.
I am looking forward to it. I would be looking forward to it even MORE if I thought the men would be wearing kilts. Rich is 6' 7" inches tall, with a swimmers physique. Can you imagine something like that in a kilt? Man, a kilt on him would be a mini skirt. Which would not be such a bad thing, though I would be swatting the ladies away from him, for sure.
5. We must avoid slander. We must avoid spreading bitter untruths about other people. In fact, some things that are true should not necessarily be publicly talked about either. Our words should be words of love. Few things destroy a Christian’s testimony as quickly as slander.
he decided that he just couldn’t take another piece of apple pie. So the family taught him to say,
H: Height: 5’4″
My two cents: The Board got this one wrong. Certainly memory is a type of hardware. But the term "hardware error" is best understood as an error in a hardware component, not simply an error associated with or related to a hardware component. That is, I agree with the definition presented by the Applicant in the Appeal Brief.
What do you think of the field? Any huge surprises?
- All partners have been emailed out. If you still haven't received yours, check your junk mail and then email us at hollybloggychristmas@gmail.com if you still can't find it.
9 / 10
To make a long story short, I was unable to come up with any sort of photo for "moon" today, mostly because there was no moon last night (it was overcast anyway), but also because I think I may have broke my foot.
Even with that awareness in mind, though, it all still feels far away for me (literally and emotionally). I have no relatives in Haiti, and no one in my immediate circles of friends have been affected by the wreckage, at least as far as I know as of now. If I knew people affected by the tragedy, I might feel differently. But, as it stands for me right now, it feels like...well, a news story. And my comprehension of this feeling (or lack of it?) unsettles me just a tad. (Maybe I really just need to watch more TV news?)
I woke up to my alarm. I didn't shout "FUCK" at the top of my lungs like I usually do because we have company with little kids. While I am not opposed to teaching my nieces how to cuss, I am not sure how my brother would feel about it, so I held back.
Comments: Perhaps interesting for its presentation of the collector and his gaze, as well as for the assumption that female beauty “translates” across cultures. Not one of Moore’s more best pieces; see “Bright Illusion” for a more thoughtful treatment of a similar subject.
It was my words with my name attached to it. And people could read it.
Joy. (And a nice tip.)
I haz a suspicious.
Here are some pictures to get you thinking about it...
No news yet... but that's OK.. Should be within the hour lol..
The next morning, Michael wakes up, flings his door open, and bounds over to the house as evidenced by his heavy, hurried steps. He doesn't wait for us and is thrilled to find two treats waiting neatly in the right spot. Lou meets him by the house, and together they crawl into bed with me. Michael laughs recalling how yesterday Peter Elf had made a mistake yesterday morning. "How dilly!" (His three-year-old linguistics haven't quite perfected s's, "How silly!") He looks at his white Lifesavers. Rips one open and places it in his mouth. Smacking the Lifesaver to the roof of his mouth over and over and his eyes searching the ceiling, he frowns. He keeps smacking on the candy, but clearly disappointed and distrustful of the new flavor. After working it around and thinking it through, he proclaims, "I don't like this, Daddy."
“I am in no position to consider anybody’s feelings”
"We're looking at writers now. We're going to spend two to three years to get it right," he said. "It needs quite a radical transformation to take it into the bigger arena."
They didn't sleep.
(taking a big breath and letting it out slowly)!! You know how it goes here....Christmas gift - new washer -Valentine's gift - new dryer...and now Birthday gift...new computer!! AND that scares the "daylight" out of me. I do have an External Hard Drive BUT what if something is wrong, what if I lose EVERYTHING, so many "what if's" !! We have an IT Guy for a neighbor....(Tony and I are soooo technically lacking) So he is coming over to install this evening. I have so many programs that have to be reinstalled too..!! (another deep breath and letting it out slowly)!!
This is what I picked! Olay White Radiance Luminous Whitening Blocker SPF50 as Dee Hsu was endorsing it, simply can't help as I'm dying to own a flawless skin like her.
The contrast between esoteric spirituality and religious fundamentalism reminds me of the tree of life and the tree of knowledge of good and evil. One is content with conscious intimacy and embracing the mystery of life, whereas the other is preoccupied with unconscious possession and striving to define and ultimately limit the infinite divine in their own creed. Perhaps every person needs to choose between these two trees or two systems of thought or belief within themselves. Our true divine self or Christ consciousness, so to speak, beckons us to listen to the still, small voice concerning the mystery of who we are. May we continue to be still and know I Am.
She is dedicated to her work, admitting that the Judy R Clark production was just her, her two cats and a small studio space. “Work really hard”, was her advice for prospering within the fashion industry. Her drive to succeed is underpinned by her faith in her own creativity, saying “believe in what you are doing is great, even if you seem to be the only one who agrees, still believe!” She is an advocate for self belief, which seems to be what keeps her motivated and an aspiring entrepreneur.
“Business is good in this economy, Charlie?” I asked.
at room temperature.
Here are my associations:
We ended our shopping trip & meet the guys in Lees Summit for a yummy Mexican dinner at Jose Peppers.
Ferrari have been open throughout the year in stating they lack downforce and struggle to get heat into the tyres. The former issue hurts pace on faster turns, while the latter has the combined effect of lost pace on harder tyres and poor single lap qualifying pace.
The very best, in-depth, and positive coverage of the 2012 March for Life was provided by -- no surprise -- EWTN: live and in living color on the main page. 'Cause that's how we roll.
As Baaklini puts it,
YET IN HIS HAND I WAS HELD SO TIGHT
But I am glad I did.
Q. You can’t brew beer without sugar.
At the beginning of February, because the Kitchen space was my featured monthly space, I decided that I was going to undertake a project of my own within my kitchen. And you have all been hearing about it in bits and pieces, from the new bag I "No Sewed" together to hold chip and bread clips, to the uber awesome pantry necessities for keeping the space ultra tidy and the food ultra fresh! Yes, I was going to do a major pantry project!
Bride put her finger in the river
I do not take issue with the author who comes across as a passionate, caring teacher eager to share her experiences in order to edify new teachers in the field of deaf education. She provides a few helpful suggestions about FM units and how to use interpreters but one "tip" had me shaking my head.
More Updates:
Pinterest can be a great resource for information on endless topics, and is especially useful for families! The format is even kid-friendly – each post is highlighted by a large photo, so even kids who can’t read can help parents find fun things to do or great books to read together.
a whiff from my blooming lilacs
Stumbling, tumbling, tripping over fingers and toes
Why do we celebrate this? In the south, it is to acknowledge the victory of good over evil by the killing of the “asura” Mahishi by the Goddess Chandika (who then on was called Mahishasuramardhini). Goddess Chandika is an embodiment of the 3 Shaktis.
Of course everyone in the gym thinks im insane but……….I don’t want to be the clean up artist for someone who “chose” to be a trophy wife. I know shes trapped at home but I have to confess…….If you made the choice based on the guys resume ……..then you cant earn my sympathy. Wasted Time? PASS Love? …….FAIL.
Jean Alexander, owner of the registered EQ SYSTEMS logo mark shown above for hair care preparations, was the prevailing party in the TTAB cancellation proceeding (decision here). L'Oreal's predecessor-in-interest, Cosmair, had petitioned to cancel the registration based on alleged prior use of the mark SHADES EQ & design for hair care products. In order to prevail, however, Cosmair had to prove priority of use, and it could do so only by tacking together the uses of two different marks (shown below, the earlier mark being on the left).
The Red Telephone – I know because I was one of the judges – raised enough to publish the book and put something towards marketing. The judges were not paid – much. The people at The Red Telephone will no doubt work really hard at getting the book out there. However, they do not have the resources or the connections of a big publisher. What if the prize-winner had submitted normally to a mainstream publisher?
Kinda like kids birthdays close to Christmas!
Uncle Randy flew us in a little plane to Petaluma to visit my sister (who I hadn't seen since before my mission, WAY too long!)
9 Sell Items
Finally, my personal soap box, wolves are endangered purely from human ignorance. …when you don’t understand you will fear, and when you fear you will destroy the animals, and if you destroy the animals you will destroy yourself…Chief Dan George.
- Craft a spa atmosphere in a teeny-tiny bathroom
These photos were taken at the District Wide Tea... Suzette or "The Five Sisters", as we are known, decorated.
Dr. Oz got the correct answer for a total of $5,900
You do know that our country is headed for a fiscal cliff, right? Not only is our Treasury Secretary trying to convince us that our serial trillion dollar deficits are sustainable, he is, at the same time, refusing to acknowledge that the growth of entitlement spending (i.e., Social Security, Medicare, Medicaid) is projected to accelerate in the next few years. Most of the politicians and bureaucrats in Washington know this, but choose to ignore it. After all, somebody else will be in the driver’s seat when the car of state speeds over the edge.
Man; yeah, I bought this ring for you,
4. Be nicer! I am not evil, but stress has taken over this month with preparing for graduation, looking and interviewing for counseling jobs, planning showers and events, tax season at my dad’s, state testing for schools, blah blah blah. I have NOT been the picture of niceness at all and have become way more annoyed at things than normal. I am not sure how I am going to actually do this or prove it, but I’ll come up with something and let you know how it goes at the end of May!
Product Details
The 10th annual ceremony, which taped earlier this month in New York, honors the casts of “Laverne & Shirley,” “Murphy Brown,” “In Living Color,” “One Day At a Time” and “Pee-wee’s Playhouse”.
Stampin Up "Vintage Vogue" Set.
Yes reader. I did say it. Extraordinary. We have achieved so much in such difficult circumstances. And that is down to Chris Hughton. A modern day miracle worker. Jesus without the long hair.
Lamborghini has opened its second showroom in India at its financial capital in Prabhadevi. It is the Italian supercar maker’s second showroom in the country after the Delhi based Exclusive Motors showroom.
Be brave my boy, as the Nature smiles in Spring,
All Photos by Melanie Parker
15 Hadleigh Parkes, 14 Rene Ranger, 13 Benson Stanley, 12 Ma’a Nonu, 11 George Moala, 10 Michael Hobbs, 9 Piri Weepu, 8 Peter Saili, 7 Luke Braid (c), 6 Chris Lowrey, 5 Ali Williams, 4 Filo Paulo, 3 Charlie Faumuina, 2 Tom McCartney, 1 Tevita Mailau:
There it is – that double hour – when the hours and minutes match. And there’s your film. I’ll end this review almost as suddenly as the film ends.
Sometimes.... the jealousy bug hits me and I envy those that have bigger house and nicer things.
I am entering this in the following challenges
I have fallen deeply in love with a primal cake recipe. I've been scouting one for my daughter's first birthday party in a few weeks, and The Food Lovers' Primal Palate recently published a coconut-flour-based chocolate cake recipe that is not only way more than "acceptable" as an analogue to traditional cake, but truly very delicious in its own right, with a delightfully smooth, moist consistency that takes to a thin layer of Joyful Abode's dark chocolate ganache very well. I made it this weekend while visiting with (nonprimal) family a few hours away, and my guinea pigs agreed that it was terrific. The main substitution that I made to the cake recipe was melted coconut oil instead of grapeseed oil, which is probably how I'll always make the recipe since I loved it so much. So thanks, Primal Palate and Joyful Abode, for the inspiration!
You were like a breeze in a warm summer day,
About a week ago one fine evening he declared, "I want to do a project with you, Mama."
Here comes Hogan into the ring.
For my entire life my dad has been a salesman. Automobiles, hardware, vet supplies on down to hair products. Many other titles could be bestowed upon my father. Hunter, cowboy, alcoholic. To name a few. He was and is a big man. These days he's no taller than my own six foot five but before back surgeries and year of hard living forced a stoop to his spine he stood within a couple of inches of seven foot. Like myself he was never a lean brand of tall. But thick-shouldered, broad-fisted, and all-too-willing to prove his strength if necessary.
Then as time passes, the comparisons become more emotional. Do you laugh as much now as you used to? Are your friendships more true?
Cream the butter and sugar together till pale. Add the eggs and beat well till fluffed up to double its volume.
Jeremy Hunt, Secretary of State for Culture, Media & Sport should not resign or be suspended because the alleged improper relationship between himself and the ‘Murdoch Empire’ has validity, he should however resign as he is now part of the investigation that is examining the standards of the press.
The shapeshifter’s stolen eyes have time to narrow, it has enough time to gather itself and prepare for a leap before the energy swirls around it, hurtles at it in a hundred blue, crackling bolts. The whole room greys as the wood’s very spiritual life is sucked from it, giving its power to Mesdan to prevent him collapsing. A moment later the thunderclaps sound, deafeningly loud, blowing the door behind him wide open with a crack, knocking Mesdan on his back. His head meets the floor and he bites his lip hard enough to draw blood.
Problems with deism:
And the big question: would any of us have challenged him on the loud music? He was not a straightforward yob or bully, he was just wild and gentle and somewhat out of control. He needn't have been gentle. The music wasn't bad, it was just that he hadn't asked us if we wanted to listen. He was not quite in this world. Tonight he might be in Yarmouth.
So there we go, I hope this has enlightened you all.
As Lily heals and with Charlie's encouragement, she falls back in love with the arts she used to live for and regains a life of her own. At first I thought Charlie's behavior was cliché, but as an addiction it adds a deep element to his character and the plot, plus a challenge for Lily that can span three books of the series titled Lilyland.
January is already looking good ...
let us be grateful
Ann Coulter on Hugh Hewitt's radio program, responding to Obama saying that he and Michelle weren't 'born with a silver spoon in their mouths':
More fun facts about Fridge Coaster:
Row 23: (knit 1 stitch knit 2 stitches together across the row) (23 stitches)
We will always love Japan!
I’ll start off with the works that I like. The estimates are uniformly insane for ALL these lots. I can’t imagine what I'd do with an extra $15 mil but I wouldn’t blow it any of these. However, if I were to bid at this auction, these are the works I’d raise my paddle on. Feel free to disagree but remember, this is my sandbox.
Army green belt - new from Target at Goodwill
They had a little book inside where you could write prayer requests but I don't think we wrote proper requests unless you count being able to marry Jaejoong and Rain as requests!
myself. You do what you have always done you will get what you have
Then after showers and a chance to revive ourselves we attempted to call a cab to go back into downtown for dinner. Last night of Jazz Fest…bad idea. We waited for 2 hours for a cab and eventually the younger set gave up and opted to eat in the room. The rest of us waited for the cab and then headed to Yo Mama’s, a strictly burger joint and well worth the escapade. You have got to try a Peanut Butter burger. Yum! Best burgers in NOLA! Then after a stroll through Bourbon St, we headed back for a good night’s sleep. Tomorrow is volunteering day. Pretty sure it is going to be awesome!
Daniels is a strong fiscal conservative. Not going to TEA party rallies does not mean he stands against the TEA Party principles of limited smaller government. He has spent the last 6+ years slashing spending, balancing the budget, creating a business friendly environment that has led to increases in jobs, and did it without punishing the rich. Does that sound like a RINO?
18. 6/7/2011. The Golden Age. Ranting against Woody Allen's new film and the general mythology of authordom versus musedom, a kind of ranty version of what I write in Heroines.
Dante realizes that he loves Veronica. When she returns to the Quick Stop, though, Randal complicates things by revealing that Dante was in love with Caitlin and is planning to date his ex again. Dante loses his temper and fights with Randal, though the two end up worn out and reconcile.
The Chandelier is from the stamp set titled "breathless" and it just called for some BLING and lots of it! I used rhinstones and "dew drops" to bling it out, and it really turned out cute!
During the week, I pulled everything out and re-organised it all again. In the two under-bed storage on the far right of the picture are my highest yardage yarn that are not lace-weight. I have identified projects that I want to make for each batch and am calling the two boxes “Stashdown 2013″. I realised that I’ve made a fundamental error in focusing only on lenght / yardage for Stashdown 2011 and 2012. I should have focussed on volume. The lace-weight yarn I have put aside for 2012 takes up one-eighth the space as the yarn for 2013.
...Harvest Church, you rock. You did it AGAIN. Your hard work behind the scenes has pulled off yet another once-in-a-lifetime event for a young bride, and you helped make her special day magical...from directing the whole event, to photography, from decorating the entire huuuuuuge ceremony and reception space, to food, from serving the food to cleaning up afterward...Harvest Church members embodied servant-leadership. I know Emily's parents (who are part of Harvest Church) are blessed and proud to be connected with such a giving, loving church family.
Eyes Wide Open
Apparently it was thought (probably told by Mrs. Stanton) the old man wouldn't kill Daddy while one of us children were walking alongside him. Daddy went to work at the new house soon after supper each evening and it still being daylight the few times I got to go, I was unafraid but come midnight or later and time to return home to bed, I can recall paralyzing fear as we passed their little shack, just waiting and knowing without doubt we would be blasted. Today I realize old Mr. Stanton must have been trying to get the nerve to murder my dad if he actually sat at the window every night with his loaded shotgun.
Bach
There's been someone on my mind this past week.
in the Groom we must put our faith.
There are scores of names on the questionnaire and their stories are quite similar. Under the section “Undermining of ground rights through intimidation and crime”, numerous names appear. A serious problem in this regard is the proliferation of squatter camps in their midst.
The amazing thing about rock, paper, scissors is that the loser actually accepts their defeat. They’ve rock, paper, scissored. End of story. S/he’s accepted their fate. You can’t get any lower than losing at rock, paper, scissors. Right?
as I was saying in preparation for the weekend I am already liquored up, and so to draw a straighter line than I can walk between these tangents I present today's Photo (for) Wednesday.
Quality time with a dear friend in town (who I don't see enough...that is going to change)
According to the legislation, anyone could bring gold or silver bullion to the mint and have it made into coins free of charge or immediately exchange bullion for the equivalent weight in coins. If you wish to read the full text of the act it is available on the Library of Congress web site.
picnics with pink lemonade
From that book, the seeds of my own novel Empire State were sown… or at least a few noir-ish ideas began percolating through the vague notion of a story that I had already been toying with.
Those ablutions which one performs with a blazing mind in the waters of the knowledge of Brahma in the Tirtha called Manasa, are the true ablutions of those that are conversant with Truth.
It hass been a few weeks since I finished uni for christmas and I had a week to kill before my lovely flatmate's 19th birthday. So for Kim's present, I decided to make her a very special birthday present using my artistic skills.
There is a gigantic crew of people in their 20’s affiliated to various degrees with our church. (Steamtown Church) Over the years we’ve grown this “crew” and while there are subgroups within the crew, it can still be viewed as a crew. Call it the “loosely related to Steamtown Church gang”. And I have noticed that no one who is introduced to our “gang” has ever had a bad impression. In fact they all wanted to come back and be a part of the “crew”.
non-reactive saucepan set over medium-low heat. Cook, whisking constantly, until the mixture begins to thicken and holds the mark of the whisk, 10 to 12 minutes. Remove pan from heat and whisk in butter, one piece at a time, until well combined. Strain mixture through a sieve into a glass bowl. Lay plastic wrap directly on surface to prevent a skin from forming. Chill 3 hours or overnight to set the curd.
67 Hanson Place, Brooklyn
But I am digressing. The relevant word that has been annoying me recently is avant-garde. These days it seems that every young composer who writes non-tonal, athematic, dissonant music is routinely described as an avant-garde composer, even though the music does not push (let alone cross) any formal or aesthetic boundaries that are less than half a century old. When it comes to formal devices and aesthetic affinities of many European composers born around 1960 - e.g., Rebecca Saunders, Isabel Mundry, Wolfram Schurig, Mark Andre, Johannes Maria Staud - there is hardly anything avant-garde about them. There is the post-Lachenmann commitment to extended playing techniques, the post-Stockhausen attention to spatial separation of sound, the post-Grisey fixation on the static properties of timbres, intervals, overtones, and textures at the expense of harmonic motion. There is also the seemingly inevitable time span of about 20 - 25 minutes, the basic pulse that is Moderato (occasionally replaced by hyperactive twitching à la Beat Furrer), the gestural rather than thematic rhetoric, and the mood that is as somber as the atmosphere at an oncology clinic. All this makes their music contemporary, to be sure, but no more formally and aesthetically challenging than Stockhausen's Gruppen (1957) or Lachenmann's Air (1968).
Note: Apparently this was a sequel to another TV-movie made earlier the same year (titled Killer Hair), and both were based on the “Crimes of Fashion” book series by Ellen Byerrum. Feh.
Add a little more salt if you want a saltier flavor.
What angers me the most is that this seems to be an activity (dare I say mindset?) most (if not solely) perpetuated by men of colour. This thing of disrespect and anger-driven entitlement to put another to shame.
Recommendation $6,000
Why do they spend so much time showing the singers's auditions? Show the Hollywood singing!!!!!
Bet'cha you were thinking
I have an extra stamp set from the new occasion catalog of Tiny Tags!
It sometimes makes me grumble when Queen's 'magnum opus' Bohemian Rhapsody is ritually dragged out and put on a pedestal, with the same arguments pulled out time and time again… it's rock, it's opera, it's grand, it's over the top, it's creative writing second to none. Yet Sparks have been quietly banging out their own brand of Bohemian Rhapsody's for the best part of 40 years! Take last years Hello Young Lovers album for example, and the opening track Dick Around. A breathtaking track, and every bit as creative as This Town Ain't Big Enough (32 years its senior!). If it’s easy, background music you're after, then Sparks is not for you. Their music is complex, and demands your full attention. Right from the opening bars, Dick Around is one intense track, building and growing as it progresses over 6 haunting minutes. By the time the menacing guitar riffs start kicking in half way through, you need a cigarette to calm down (and I don’t even smoke!).
I feel like "my look" is "my look" and I just adjust the shoes a bit to glam it up for nighttime.
Dec 3rd – is eating breakfast with Master Georgie. He just said herbal WITH the H! He said I could give him a hard time about English so he would give me a hard time when I try to learn Luganda, IF I learn it at all. Haha! Looks like we’re off to a great start!!!
To all you fashionistas out there – keep doing what you do! You may see me copy you from time to time, and I hope I can return the inspiration favor too :)
I'm trying to understand what possible motivation you may have had for publishing that vile cartoon depicting the shooting of the chimpanzee that went crazy. I guess you thought it would be funny to suggest that whomever was responsible for writing the Economic Recovery legislation must have the intelligence and judgment of a deranged, violent chimpanzee, and should be shot to protect the larger community. Really? Did it occur to you that this suggestion would imply a connection between President Barack Obama and the deranged chimpanzee? Did it occur to you that our president has been receiving death threats since early in his candidacy? Did it occur to you that blacks have historically been compared to various apes as a way of racist insult and mockery? Did you intend to invoke these painful themes when you printed the cartoon?
The thief comes only to steal and kill and destroy; I have come that they may have life, and have it to the full. (John 10:10, NIV)
Hubby: Blogging IS NOT a chore…
While Android has its fair share of hit games, the iPhone has the clear advantage here.
So I ask, is this really “all about the truth”, as Bob repeatedly claims, or is this really only about trying to win an argument at all costs?
Britain today is in the throes of the greatest and direst transformation in its history. We are becoming an ideological state, a country with an official state ideology enforced by the power of the state. In “hate crimes” we now have people serving jail sentences for political thoughts. And the Parliament is now moving to expand that category ever further. Affirmative action is part of it. The terror against anyone who dissents from Political Correctness on campus is part of it. It’s exactly what we have seen happen in Russia, in Germany, in Italy, in China, and now it’s coming here. And we don’t recognize it because we call it Political Correctness and laugh it off. My message today is that it’s not funny, it’s here, it’s growing and it will eventually destroy, as it seeks to destroy, everything that we have ever defined as our freedom and our culture.
Props to these guys for their sheer ballsiness (if that's even a word).
The words, the actions, the feels,
Came in today and Lt Sienna says "Hey Rev! You're an FTO (Field Training Officer), right? I'm sending you an OJT to train this evening!"
Miss Bella-Boo.....
-Reed Lyon (3:5x 1500m)
And strangely that's probably the reason I haven't been about recently. Having got the energy back I've been missing for so long - the last thing I felt like doing was sitting for hours on end at the computer. I've been flitting about doing this and that, trying to catch up on all the stuff I let slide in the last month and I've been so chilled out you could keep your pint of milk fresh for a week by putting it down next to me.
237. Thi Saun Hin (chick pea, potato, eggplant, green bean, zucchini, carrot, cabbage, broccoli & cauliflower - cooked in a' Myanmar style') @ Burma Tokyo (Pittsburgh, PA) 8:05 p.m.
Every night in my dreams
Selsor’s many appeals paid off and he was granted a new trial 20 years after his first, but that jury also found him guilty and sentenced him to death.
The Japan Center for Economic Research, which tracks Japanese GDP on a monthly basis, said consumer spending fell for the first time in fourth months, falling 0.4%, while exports were flat.
The CWRL was an explosion that helped launch a new discipline, Computers and Writing, and served as a model of what is possible for others: other scholars, other teachers, other institutions. Suddenly, the old horizons were completely transcended and entirely new worlds opened up. Out of this revolutionary and evolutionary shift came hundreds of scholarly articles, research projects, and useful technological tools and innovations. Graduate students were supported, trained, and launched into professional lives in areas that simply had not existed before. Scholars and researchers became enchanted with the intellectual challenges and engaged technology as new subjects for their work. Conferences sprouted up, new journals, and whole departments at other universities, as these ways of being, learning, and teaching in the world became manifest in great part because of John’s tireless energies and spacious, inclusive vision.
Probably the biggest change accompanying the new name is that every gallery stroll is now an art scavenger hunt with the possibility of winning prizes. In the past, only one gallery stroll a year was a scavenger hunt. This month, participants who visit most of the galleries and identify selected art works will be entered to win a Kindle. And of course, attendees who don’t want to do the scavenger hunt can still stroll from gallery to gallery.
Our people are defined by a few basic characteristics and have willingness to take on challenges and explore new ideas. They have the drive to excel and the determination to perform their best. Advanced approaches to the clients’ special construction needs in order to find unique and environment- friendly constructive solutions. Company’s entrepreneurial spirit and consumer-driven determination helps it to respond successfully to new opportunities and consistently improve its methods, resulting in groundbreaking results and recommendations from our clients.
It’s the only way, in a land convulsed with insanity,
On Day 3 of our journey through the kitchen details I'll show you the north wall. This wall isn't ENTIRELY finished...a couple teeny things to finish....but I wanted to show you one of my favorites. So as we can see....this is the before. (Gosh, I hope you didn't think that was the after. ;-)
Brands are still very important. The value of Sierra Nevada Pale, Widmer Hefeweizen, Fat Tire, and Boston Lager is immense. But these brands are sort of like the macro brands--they don't boast the kind of dynamic growth potential of specialty beers. In order to grow, breweries can't depend on a beer that accounts for 80% of production. They need legions of small-sellers, beers that account for a few percent of their total sales, to boost growth. One of the great virtues of beer is its infinite possibilities: a brewery can create a product for a market as tiny as a few beat reporters. Atomization is the nature of US culture, though. No one gets their news, entertainment, or products from the same few titans. For the near future, anyway, niche is the way.
As I’ve mentioned before, I work graves at the local production dairy, doing all those fun tests that need to be run on milk before it can go out to the general public for sale. Working overnight and trying to take care of a toddler does not mesh well. This was going to be a point of panic for me initially; although my daycare is a 24-hour facility, I would have to sleep at some point during the day and I could not leave a 3-year-old unattended while I slept.
She claims to be horrified by the backlash she has experienced, especially online, as a result of these features. Twitter lights up angrily every time another bit of bluster from Brick finds its way onto the net and the newspaper’s hit counter probably goes into meltdown.
Taking indoor photos continues to prove challenging, to say the least! Pulling my hair out a little while getting acquainted with my Nikon D3000 and figuring out what aperture to use and blah, blah, bah humbug! Tis not the season to be wrestling with a new camera. I'm ready to sit down, eat, drink, and be merry!
every time I pass.An angel in pink walks up to me
on fansites, forum.
War! be it weeks, months, or years, an arm’d race is advancing to
Second, the anthology of science fiction short stories about a post-peak oil future, which I proposed in a post a little while back, has taken a major step toward realization; after talking to a couple of publishers, I have one that’s interested. I’d like to ask everyone who has a story in the works, but hasn’t yet submitted it, to get it up on the internet and post a link to it in the comments to this post by November 10. Yes, that’s a firm deadline.
“I’ll send a bill fer the seed. Now ya’ll git, I gotta git home in time fer Rawhide, plus supper’s a waitin. Git.” A big glob of spit, resembling creosote, hit the ground, it’s splatter barely missing three pairs of scuffed brogans.
I kinda wish that rooster would stay out of my freezer! And take the spirit of Herbert "A Chicken in Every Pot" Hoover with him!
So when Paul met Onesimus, he knew his greatest need, a Saviour. So Paul led him to the Lord. I am going back to Philemon, verse 10. He called Onesimus his son and he could do so for he gave birth to him while a prisoner. That verse reads, “I beseech thee for my son, Onesimus, whom I have begotten in my bonds.” He became Paul’s spiritual son.
So no, This Means War is not a movie for people who like to stimulate their brain with, you know, thinking and stuff. It’s a great film for watching Reese Witherspoon wear vertinginous heels and show off her great-but-tiny legs. It’s also a good film for watching handsome men wear tight-fitting shirts and beautifully cut suits, all while they try and vie for the same woman’s attention and punch/shoot several men in the process. That’s what passes for romantic comedy today. Fuck sexual chemistry. When I see films like This Means War, it amazes me how variable an actor’s career can be, particularly when Witherspoon veers from something as excellent as Walk The Line to a role as daft as this. Chris Pine, I think, generally chooses the same type of characters, and that’s probably a good thing because he plays cocky well. So there are some pros, but they’re overwhelmed but the all-consuming stupidity of this film.
When the book came into my hands I was not so sure what I was getting into. A new novelist, a differently themed background story – would I enjoy reading this book? I wondered.
Like Steinbeck’s letter, Justice’s poem speaks for itself and conveys a quiet celebration of life. As JJS states, it’s a poem worth memorizing.
This is one of those classic horror movies that polarizes audiences even to this day. It was made by resident cheap-ass hack director Clive Barker in the days before he was responsible for movies like Midnight Meat Train and Candyman, and while I don’t have much vitriol to espouse upon it, I’m not raving either, and even if you like this movie, there are certainly some really goofy things about it that I have to point out or else I’ll never be able to sleep right again! Well, okay, maybe not. But…just get on with it.
I don't trust GOOGLE at all...they like to embed your software with Lord knows what (so they can track where you go).
There are certain situations and circumstances that we cannot avoid nor do we have full control of. That is why most of the time, we should be prepared that the things that may happen. In our house, certain incident would happen like breaking of pipes or electrical and technical problems may occur.
As part of this tour they will be stopping in Edmonton on May 1 and 2 and we would like to show them a warm welcome.
By that I mean the ability/desire/necessity of moving from town to town -across state- out of state- back and forth- and so on. It’s rare in modern America to have the same neighbors for more than a few years. And as a consequence a loss of physical, geographical, well-rooted identity has become epidemic.
Kosher salamis. 2nd Avenue Deli has the distinction of being the only major Kosher deli of significance left in Manhattan (other than Ben’s or Artie’s, which I don’t include in the same league). The other famous Jewish delis, such as Katz’s, The Carnegie, Sarge’s and The Stage, lack Kosher certification, even though they might serve some Kosher goods. Katz’s is even known to serve cheeseburgers and cheesesteaks, which is a big no-no. However, 2nd Ave is open Saturday and Sunday, not following the practice of Shomer Shabbos which is also a no-no for strict Orthodox Jews. Well, you can’t have everything these days.
"Prescription for Happiness" and "SOS for Love" were series whose installments went untitled.
In Psalm 145:18 (NIV), we read, “The Lord is near to all who call on him, to all who call on him in truth.” James 4:8 (NIV) admonishes us, “Come near to God and he will come near to you.”
And we ate. And ate. And ate some more. I even ate an Italian sausage and felt terrible about it. I haven't fallen off the vegetarian wagon very often since I started, but it has happened a few times. The fair and all the yummy smells and delicious flavors pushed me over the edge. I did manage to stay away from the Krispy Kreme burger and the fried Oreos. But the sausage got me.
How could you miss those events?
Speaking of rare, Rain Is Not My Indian Name remains one of the few children's-YA novels featuring a Native protagonist that’s set in modern day.
Now for the fun flap. Get one negative and one positive snap magnet.
After Seagate - 37.4% (64 of 171 cases)
You want to shoot the moon near the horizon or with something interesting in the foreground! (like a eagle?)
This isn't to say I won't blog again at some point. I like the idea of doing some sort of group blog that has more of a focus than this one, but this is basically it for Beetsolonely. All of the old stuff will continue to live here for as long as Blogger or its future incarnation lets it.
I'm also joining the fun at Rhoda's Mantel Party. If you are visiting from a party, thanks for stopping by. I can't wait to see what everyone else has done this year!
The United States recognizes the provisional government as the de facto authority of the State of Israel.
Muxing mode : DVD-Video
Place two redcurrants, if using, in each of the four popsicle molds or disposable cups. Fill with the mango mixture, leaving a bit of headroom at the top, as the pops will expand. Freeze for about 40 minutes or until the pops begin to set, then insert pop sticks into each mold. Continue to freeze until firm—about 5 hours, or overnight, or upto 2 weeks.
We living here on earth are called the Church Militant for a reason, and that reason is that we are at war with Hell. Yes, the war has been won, but every war has casualties. Time has not played out, and the casualty list is growing larger and larger. How many have already been lost because we have been living in a feel-good age we don't want to be reminded of such unpleasentries? We've not done ourselves any favors with all the nicey-nice hand holding. Too many of us Catholics don't know our faith, which means that too many of us don't understand our enemy.
F*cking Unicron!
“You want to relate to trauma as an experience, not as a diagnostic category.” – Dr. William Steele
･GALAPAGOS 005SH
I'm full of hope and faith. Maybe someday things will clear up, and I can take him through page by page on this blog and show him what I've been up to.
The challenge alleges that the IPAB is not sufficiently independent of the executive; the qualifications for the appointment of judicial members on the board are contrary to the law of the land; and that irregular appointments have been the norm rather than the exception. If such infirmities were remedied in future, could the IPAB offer scope for the vesting of specialist IP adjudicatory functions.
One shortcrust pastry case, either home-made or bought
My goal is to pay it forward. Not just once, but many times over.
Mickey: "How was I to know?"
“Take now thy son, thine only son Isaac, whom thou lovest, and get thee into the land of Moriah; and offer him there for a burnt offering upon one of the mountains which I will tell thee of.”
Since it was warmer and I seemed to thaw out. Zip and I took a trip to Mannings in Eas Berlin for a yarn buying trip. Recently I joined an online group called 'Dream Sweater' sponsored by Julie from the Knitting at Large blog. Those of us who live close enough are going to get together in Frederick, MD about once a month and compare our progress and discuss problems.
According to Kramer's family, he had never displayed any sort of self-destructive/suicidal qualities and was, despite his well-founded paranoias, a pretty content and easy-going guy. After all, he was a millionaire.
Here’s the story of how I ended up with this mop:
NB: Do not place feet in your fishtank at home. The fish are actually a particular species, doctor fish, who do like the skin of human feet, your fish will probably just cower in the corner or have a heart attack. Not advised.
When going down the hills, remember to put extra space between you and those around you. Everyone’s going faster and you need more time to react if someone loses control. That guy riding down the hill with no hands? You definitely don’t want to ride close to him. He could easily lose it, so put even more space between him and you by slowing a little. Or, if you can, pass him so he’s behind you.
- Brooklyn father and son called deadbeat slumlords, blamed for Philadelphia fire that killed two firefighters. Failed Messiah
Yes!!!
(Klaus Weiss, 1985)
It's the future.
from sacred space to sacred space?”
21. crowd
Now THAT'S a cool feeling.
So this Mother's Day, I did something out of the ordinary even for me.
Hello pretty dresses.
Welcome to week 12 of finish it up Friday!
The giveaway will close on the 2nd October and the winner will be announced shortly after.
The full moon is too bright - almost mercilessly so. In a dark sky it's almost dazzling. The physical features are almost washed out.
Now it's time for a new Weekly Candy...
Extroverted Feeling supports social forms that ease social tension and maintain communal bonds while Extroverted Thinking attends to those that are well-suited to the demands of the environment upon the community.
Lanigan recalled dropping the big guy off in a pretty hot zone. One of the other choppers was hit by an RPG shortly after Lanigan had dropped off the Marines in his Blackhawk. Flying parts from that helicopter nicked a hydraulic line on Lanigan’s own bird. He’d had to limp his way back home and was lucky to make it. Lanigan decided that if this was the same guy, he was not a man to be trifled with.
Me: "No."
-Salt and textured paper towels (optional)
Ridiculous belief opens the door for Miraculous relief.
I’ve had to come to the point where I am willing to look foolish for God. Take the risk of being wrong. And believe.
Even the thought of reading, watching a movie, looking at my computer made my head swim, my stomach knot and my guts twist.
that stretched long fingers
V’Ger creates a copy of Ilea to serve as an avatar, but the crew does not get much of anything out of her even though they put a silly headdress on her. For reasons I cannot put my figer on, this whole sequence of events, which is something that would have fit right in with TOS, seems dated and silly rather than an homage. It proved Trek had not grown in the decade it had been off the air. It is disappointing.
Most of us that live in relative prosperity and security can usually identify with one or two of the categories listed in the scripture cited above, but we usually have trouble in identifying ourselves with categories such as “poor”, “captives”, “blind”, and “oppressed”. It is my belief that this is one of the reasons why the Fullness of the Good News is not being realized amongst us in the prospering nations is exactly because our material circumstances prevent us from seeing that, with respect to our spiritual state, ALL of humanity is covered by the categories listed.
We can also add that the compliance costs amount to more than $8,000 per American employee, but we’ll have to stop the comparisons there or else this editorial would rival Atlas Shrugged in length—but with statistics. Yikes!
Following Vanquish I played agaist a mate's Grey Knights. I lost the fluffy warriors that was in my Vanquish list for 3 wracks, which allowed me to try out upping the trueborn to 4 strong (all with blasters). Although I liked the extra shots the game was a white wash with me conceeding turn 4 so we could get on with some games of magic with other mates who had arrived. I suffered rubber lance syndrome. I killed one dreadnought all game, and didn't touch any of the other 2 dreadnoughts or 3 stormravens.
The prayer (prayist?) proceeded through an acknowledgement of the usual litany of Christian superheroes. He thanked an unseen timekeeper who granted us the opportunity to join together. He gave a brief preview of the available entrees, specifically mentioning both turkey and ham. He said he did all this “in Jesus’ name” (though I bet he’d be resuming his usual role as Bobby in just a minute), then everybody said “amen.”
135. “We can throw stones, complain about them, stumble on them, climb over them, or build with them.” – William Arthur Ward
“The sticky tape isn’t sticking,” my friend continued. “The chill isn’t sticking either.”
Announcer: ...the first of our final contestants, give it up for Tea Rat.
As I said in the original post: I'm not trying to convince anyone to live this way. I'm just saying it's possible. I'm saying that children are worthy of our trust, and capable of making decisions on how to act and spend their time. I'm saying you can't tell if the freedom is "working" if you judge by what happens in one day or one week. And it will never "work" if you expect that, if given the freedom, the kids will eventually realize that your preferences are best, and they will behave exactly how you want them to.
The chalkboard can be hung on the wall with the hooks on the back or can be hung by rustic twine which comes along with the chalkboard.
Go to www.tinroof-productions.com because it is simply fantastic. I mean, anyone who is anyone has spent a large percentage of his/her day perusing the pages.
I kept my distance for awhile, figuring she would wrap things up soon. I could kill a few minutes of time while her perfect colors were mixed, she would pay, leave and then I would go to the counter to get my samples. It's a pretty small store, and I didn't want to overwhelm the guys at the counter - they had their hands full. And, if I hung back, I could hear all the juicy details. (People's color problems to me are just as juicy as the latest celebrity gossip on Perez Hilton. Weird, huh?)
2 tablespoons finely minced shallot
It has triggered urgent talks this week at the Ministry of Justice where it is believed that Steve Wagstaffe, the director of public sector prisons, refused to overturn the decision.
Ok, I know, those dominoes have been in the last 3 photos at least. I will get round to using them, honest. You can spy some distress markers ready for a DT project which is lingering to the left of shot. The tiny Prima flowers and cut piece of card, oh, and the peacock feathers DI are from the DT card I made yesterday. My 'much needed' reading glasses/crafting glasses are bottom right just below the backs from some double-sided tape and 3D foam squares.
There's a new post on Parent-Free By Choice today, Not Well Adjusted: The Day It Ended. The author explains that she is no longer speaking to her mother because she "couldn't take her constant judging, harassing, and demands anymore."
Princess Parisa (Kathryn Grant), daughter
David Millar, principal at NHHS, said they “thought it would be a great opportunity for the school and the community to come together at a school sports day to celebrate the opening of their new West Campus.
06 André Gurov Units - Revelation Of Wrath (5:13)
Here is the updated template for 2013. To all those who have asked for it, thanks for your patience! I hope there are no mistakes, but if you find one, please let me know.
Obviously, do not use a plastic vase or anything else flammable. Even though the clay bakes at a very low temperature you can never take any risks.
The Text kiln was also at one time used as a church for Sunday services which further establishes the quote attributed to Benjamin Franklin that “beer is proof that God loves us and wants us to be happy”. Hmm, good name for a show, that.
Start by leaving a 6" tail
Thing is, not long after publication, The Bitch and the partner she had now went into a bar and saw a mutual friend. We walked over, and he stood, looking rather stiff. 'Ive just read your novel,' he told me, and then turned to my partner, his fist clenching. 'You bastard!' he told him.
JW: My parents didn’t buy a lot of LPs, but they did buy some Herb Alpert & the TJB. My dad loved listening to the mid-sixties Ramsey Lewis Trio and anything by Anthony Newley. “Roar of the Greasepaint, Smell of the Crowd” was played a lot when it came out. The TJB was fun music, and not too complicated.
In this instalment we will introduce and examine the use of Ethernet networking with Arduino systems.
Restrictions on municipal broadband also are opposed by Google, Intel, Alcatel-Lucent and several other telecom companies that wrote a letter to lawmakers in May.
( AGAIN........... one of these days I'm just gonna go to work in my underwear)
It seems to me that only in cases like the LATAS case should the foreign meaning be decisive. It should not have been decisive here without real proof that "flower" is the primary meaning of FIORE to the ordinary American purchaser.
Yvonne, an internationally renowned ballerina and choreographer, is between life and death, in coma, for an extended period, as a result of an attempt on her life. George Stenner, a writer who has for years followed her career, with a view at preparing an authorized biography, is convinced by her family to speed up his work.
Surviving hate to die of love
It's kind of awesome how blogging provides a way to get sponsors like this for me as well as deals like this for anyone who reads blogs. Like a club with serious discounts. I personally have used the discount code off of numerous other blogs and their sponsored offers over the years including most recently for baby products for Ever. Thanks for reading. xo
In other news, I leave at the end of the month for a two-month book tour of the US, and will be writing daily blog entries on the adventures of a writer on the road. So watch this space.
One word of warning: If you have flabby cheeks, they will start flapping around inside. Lol~ That's how strong the wind is. And it's kinda cold....
I'm participating in the Worst Movies Ever blogfest sponsored by sci-fi author Alex Cavanaugh. And I've decided to implicate myself, as I happen to own every movie on this list. That is to say, I've watched each of them multiple times and take pleasure from each of them in at least some minor way. But essentially, they are flawed. And I think it's more interesting to talk about why these relatively entertaining movies are bad than trying to re-explain why Howard the Duck or Battlefield Earth flopped.
Clinical Microbiology : 90
"The people of Iran are tired and hungry, they are collapsing under the dictatorship. In today's Iran, eating a chicken or a piece of meat is luxury -- whole families cannot afford even one chicken per month," he said.
I love science fiction AND fantasy, so I asked Leah to describe the difference between the two as she sees it.
3. Prepare the tehina (do not add parsley)
In addition, according to an EMarketer report, U.S. local online ad spending is also expected to grow, anywhere from 8% to 18% annually. So if the publication has a local website, that may also be a viable spot for advertising.
Simple, yet so tasty. In the past I have served this with new potatoes drenched in butter, but tonight I went for peas and sweetcorn. The sweetness of the veg complimented the salty bacon beautifully.
Fourth is a pork terrine draped with lentils in a vinaigrette, accented with frissé, radish shavings, and drops of mustard sauce. The combo conjures a multilayer pungent bitterness, softened by the velvety terrine. It’s dark, mild, and excellent, despite its focus on my least preferred selection of flavors.
Am hoping it was a one-off. Would very much like to sleep tonight.
That pretty much sums up my weekend. You can all go back to work now.
Note the mention of “the hill” as in Washington!
Like their problems before the earthquake struck, Haiti's current predicament can seem so overwhelming... people begin to feel there is nothing they can really do.
Eygalieres
We need to face the pain for what it is. We need to weep and lament and grieve. Of course I tie this to the death of my friend Davin, and I preach to myself, “Don’t flee from this.” Especially for those of us on the periphery, it’s easy to want to not move closer to the pain, to just get back on with our lives. But a few thoughts on this, the day of Davin’s first memorial service.
Cricut Christmas Solutions (Window)
I think you must have heard before that potatoes with eyes (sprouts) are poisonous as it contains Solanine (very toxic even in small quantities). Anyway, you just have to remove these sprouts. Better throw away the potato if it has turned bad, green underneath the skin and has too many sprouts. Although some research has shown that you have to eat at least a whole bag of potatoes to actually be poisoned but it is better to practice some caution. Better be safe than sorry!
Gabe is 2 and is a bit clumsy, but is our happy-go-lucky little man!
They start with the (mistaken) notion that the sight of people using string/can telephones would evoke some sort of wistful longing for an innocent childhood heretofore forgotten. Unfortunately for their genius ad men, most people watching television during primetime were not born during the Great Depression and may not have ever known the joy and wonder of sticking their faces into used soup cans. I tried it once when I was a kid. It sucked and I didn't do it again, savagely beating anyone who suggested it from that day forth. This is the kind of shit old people love to think is fun because back when cars cost a nickel, no one knew any fucking better. When they were done talking into tin cans, they would take them off the strings and kick them, for Jesus' sake. Seriously, that was a game. Kick the can. Use the phone that's right there on there on the goddamn desk, lady, and stop talking into your garbage.
Most famously, of course, he was a pirate and Radio 1 DJ. (Let me clarify: he was a DJ on Radio 1 and on pirate radio; he wasn’t a Radio 1 DJ and a pirate. Though to judge from his CV that’s one of the very few things he never tried his hand at.)
I'm so excited about this upcoming book written by Blake Boles. If you are an unschooling family that is now or will someday consider college or options to college, a young adult looking for alternatives to the expensive college path or someone wanting to expand their ideas of what learning can continue to be as an adult, this will be an excellent resource.
And I come up at eight,
A generous amount of good quality unsweetened cocoa powder and chocolate chips makes this loaf beautifully rich. The fantastic loaf does not need anything to taste delicious, just eat on its own. Not only that, this is a great recipe for beginner bread bakers, no complicated step to follow.
Hello and thank you for stopping by. I haven´t blogged for a while cause a lot of studying came in the way. But finally i have more time to craft and also to blog once in a while.
11And the smoke of their torment ascendeth up for ever and ever: and they have no rest day nor night, who worship the beast and his image, and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name.
Many things impressed me about her missional journey.
For men who have their will
Earle Warren & his Orchestra--Tush
Twiddleybitz Early bird special – PREBOOK and Pay for your class and you will receive a FREE Twiddleybitz goodness package VALUE @$15
that has been used by both oppressive rulers and Western democracies -- devices that enable governments or law enforcement agencies to track and monitor individuals via their cell phones, e-mail, and Internet browsing histories.
And ta-dah, I brought this baby back home!
Hell of the Living Dead (C, 1980) aka Night of the Zombies, Zombie Creeping Flesh, Virus, Zombie Inferno. This Bruno Mattei zombiefest never got any respect and I can understand why but it's still always been a favorite of mine anyway. A gas leaked at a factory causes a worldwide zombie outbreak. A SWAT team of goofballs, after dispatching some terrorists, get a vacation (still in uniform) in New Guinea. They join a female reporter and her Tom-Savini-lookin' sidekick and wander around, fighting gory zombies and trying to pretend they're part of stock natives-and-wildlife footage inserted from The Real Cannibal Holocaust. That's not all the movie stole, either -- Goblin's Dawn of the Dead score gets more airtime here than it did in Dawn. All characters are incredibly obnoxious and their behavior is profoundly stupid so you wonder if they guy who wrote it was suffering a brain injury, but there's a lot of zombie action, and while the gore effects are mostly cheap, they're plentiful and extreme. A rat runs out of a creepy old woman's bloated stomach, heads explode, an idiot who's playing dress-up in the middle of a house full of zombies gets devoured, and someone's eyes are gouged out... from the inside, by a zombie reaching through the roof of her mouth! Yeah, it's dumb (the dubbed dialogue is hilarious, and every character is incredibly obnoxious) and derivative, but Mattei obviously isn't just playing "got your money" here, and you've got to respect that -- if nothing else, he's a showman. The zombies are usually chewed-up looking, while Dawn of the Dead only smeared blue paint on most of them, and even if some of the effects are just meat held against a leg and gnawed on, at least there's plenty of it. And there's probably more pointless scenes of people vomiting than any movie I can remember. People pan this but I've probably seen it a dozen ties and I still love it. I like Mattei's other dog, Rats: Night of Terror, too. So there.
It was a perfect day to be sailing! There was just enough wind to puff out the white sails like the distended belly of a Bamboo-eater. It carried the sharp perfume of the sea, salty and carrying the smell of wet wood. Hardly a cloud in the sky, the sun sparkling off the waves and not a pirate to be seen!
Jeffrey L. Fox, 40, Cranbury, N.J.
From his own personal journey along the Celtic path, Donald McKinney shows how their wisdom can be applied to enrich our day-to-day lives. He explores the Celtic connection with the natural world, showing us how to find our own Sacred Space and tap into earth energies through meditation. Revealing the power and significance of the changing seasons and lunar cycles, he also offers practical guidance on the Celtic approach to everything from relationships to work and health.
Happy bidding!
One last thing I would like to mention is to the band (as I hope you all read this): I want you to know each of you are so talented, and don’t let anyone tell you otherwise. You bring joy to every person you play for and it’s not that often that I find a band who can do that. I want to thank each of you for all of the smiles, laughs and good times you have given me whenever I see you play, and I know there will be more good times in the future. For Brian, Damian and Lewis: I don’t really know you guys, but always know you have a fan who will always support you no matter what (and next time you see me at a show please come say hi!). For Dan and Kyle: thank you for all of the hugs (sweaty or otherwise), smiles, thank yous, set lists, kind words and silly messages. Everytime I see you guys it brings a smile to my face and makes my day better. I hope you guys know that you are both my friends and I love you both so much!
that’s when, to her front lawn’s fringe,
Parents love us in spite of their mistakes. Sometimes they love us more than we know and only in their poetry or song after they’ve passed, do we see just how much.
7/ Islamic terrorism on our home soil, while Islamic terrorist gen asylum here.
6) Fried Bean curd(Tau pok), 10 pcs
Because we never learn do we?
And last night, as she was going down the stairs, she noticed my cat at the bottom of the stairwell, lying on the floor, looking up at her. Just as she reached the bottom of the steps – she heard “Here, kitty, kitty, kitty…”
Find Out More
The law regarding Free Speech is, therefore: say what you like as long as you are prepared to face the consequences of potentially offending another person's Rights.
While saying that the Guantanamo prisoners could safely come to the United States, Powell faulted Obama for not moving faster on the prison closing and “frankly giving enough time to opponents of it to marshal their forces as to why we shouldn’t do this.”
reasons for the wording...
Large vine tomatoes halved and roasted long & slow (with xtra virgin, s&p, bay, thyme) till they start to yield on the sides.
Midnight in Paris releases in New York and Los Angeles today, with other U.S. cities to follow.
"When you seek a new path to truth, you must expect to find it blocked by expert opinion."
The pics in this album are some of my favs ever!!! they just look so clean in their white shirts and blue jeans, which for any of you who have kids, know it is a very rare occasion to see them clean!!!!!!!
Afloat in sympathetic harmony
I shall continue to learn!
*Julie, I remember you and Janet sipping drinks on the deck watching your kids swim and laughing at me for being inside cleaning the window tracks in Caitlin's room with Q-tips*
The gangs, per court records, carried out crimes of all sorts, everything from murder and drug dealing to gun possession and racketeering.
8. Red Lights (Livin’ Blues, Christiansen) 6:16
I see the blue sky.
Stamps - Hot Off the Press Tiny Words and Images, Fiskars Swirls of Fun
My thesis is moving forward for real. I have two solid chapters that make sense in succession and are pointing very clearly to a third, which is more exciting than I have the means to describe. But it's been drawing on a lot of mental resources, and when I've come to the end of the day, I've had nothing for anyone else. D and I both go through this -- he'll return after a particularly intense day, having successfully left work at work, but he doesn't quite make it home in his state of mind for several hours after he gets through the door. He floats in some kind of limbo that makes for pretty quiet dinners. I understand -- sometimes the brain doesn't reset for a little while. So I leave him alone until he's ready.
No, that's not what I heard.....
Hi everyone. I have not gone toooooo far. I've missed blogging these past two weeks. Trust, I've been in blogland -- visiting some of my favorites, like Under A Cherry Tree. Well, a few days ago, I came across one of Jin's fabulous tutorials on making some Christmas tags using Silhouette Studio and the Cameo.
With his gloved hand he never got to wave goodbye
And then I'm thinking... My mom works so hard. She's still paying for my brother's pocket money because my brother is in the army. Should I give my brother that money?
And I think this was a good decision——
Time to bite into the plot now: On vacation in a Mexican resort village, Steven (Hugo Stiglitz) meets a...
1/3 carat emerald-cut diamond earring Ronnie gave me.
economic and social purposes, with their own members as well as
It builds to a head and Darcy out of the blue proposes to Elizabeth. She’s shocked, she hadn’t realised he felt that way, in fact she thought he hated her too. So rejects him and doesn’t pull any punches as to the reason why. This is the prejudice part of her tail you see. She believes this total stranger Wickham and lets it influence her opinion over someone else because she believes it so implicitly.
(not to mention HEAVY) so it sits up on the top
2. Alessandro Nivola (1999) – In my opinion, his portrayal of Henry was the best. He managed to convey the seductive qualities of the character, his gradual transformation into an earnest lover and the anger he felt at being rejected. Superb performance.
Do you really have nothing to give? Share a family's story - share links to their fundraisers and blogs. Maybe you really can't help, but maybe you are connected to someone who can. Pray. Don't just say you are praying - really take two minutes to pray. Lift a family up in prayer; God is powerful. Sometimes, I pray while I am doing something else. Washing bottles is a good time for me. It's somewhat mindless and a bit time consuming; a great time to bring my mind elsewhere and present my needs and a Godly family's needs to the feet of the Throne.
On and on and on I step out that front door and im gone!
I cannot believe that "Obama for America" would take this stand, and it makes me seriously question their ethics as an organization and their view of the political process. I will support President Obama in the election, but I will give absolutely no money to "Obama for America".
I want to leave my worries behind
FB: (with great relief) YES! YES! THAT'S IT! A BODYSUIT!
Yeah, run hide under the bed
The game swung from end to end but it seemed a goal would not arrive - until the 58th minute. David Templeton struggled to control a cross from Jamie Hamill but the ball fell to Rudi Skacel who drilled it home for the opening goal. The Czech Republic star was about to be substituted but his well taken goal gave him a stay of execution. Minutes later, Celtic's Kris Commons was shown a straight red card by referee Craig Thomson after a lunge on Mrowiec and the game ran away from the visitors.
This morning the Supreme Court released it's opinion in Microsoft v. i4i, and provided "clean sweep" support (10-0) that patents may only be invalidated under "clear and convincing" evidence.
Repentance is the cure
9. Untitled
The new Shanghai Tang autumn/winter collection was presented this Friday at Moganshan lu art district 莫干山路艺术区. (I used to live close by).
BTW, the milkbones really do keep your dog's teeth clean. We just took our pooches to the vet for their yearly check-up and shots last week. The vet was impressed with how clean their teeth was and askjed if we had been brushing them (yeah right. Good luck with that).
Set among the Beverly Hills jet set, but starring Mitchum as an ambulance-driving mechanic, this intense Freudian melodrama is one of the forgotten masterworks of film noir – a disturbingly cool investigation of the terrors of sexuality. The sets, characters, and actions are extremely stylized, yet Preminger’s moving camera gives them a frightening unity and fluidity, tracing a straight, clean line to a cliff top for one of the most audacious endings in film history.
Of course, if I do not mention the narrative, then the racoons, small rodents and other small creatures that strike fear into people’s hearts will be sent after me. The narrative was fantastic. It read like something that would come out of a teenager’s mouth, but without the profanity or innuendos. While I was disappointingly starved of the latter, I was compensated with the emotional content and the way the action was conveyed. Speaking of action, which my insane troll logic links with the plot, which in turn decided to build up its mysteries slowly, and then landed the relevant twist on us with the fury of a thousand suns. There really were some pretty impressive twists buried in this book – but that is not quite as impressive as the amount of things that the author manages to tangle into the plot. If you haven’t grasped already, a massive range of concepts and techniques are drafted into the story. What’s more is that the majority of it all fitted in – with the exception of the exposition regarding souls, which might as well have been lifted directly from a CLAMP manga, because it was genuinely convoluted and weird. But in an entertaining, all part of the charm, type way.
NAUSEA, LOOSE BOWEL MOVEMENTS, DIARRHEA: This is a common reaction when the solar plexus chakra opens and releases the stored fear, anger and resentment held in the area. Karmic and family issues will produce gas and farting. The Bach Flower Rescue Remedy can ease these symptoms. Don’t be afraid to take it every 30 minutes if necessary.
Did you know that since 2002 Iran have had 10 major earthquakes with no less than 31000 fatalities. No huge news reports, no remembrance days for these victims.
Last weekend I was lucky enough to travel to Florida to visit a couple of girl friends. I was on a mission to see some manatees, but that was not to be. However, we did see some freaky wildlife.
Uh huh... and gay and lesbian spouses?
Subject: Reply soonest and call me
I made three versions of this necklace before I came up with something un-hideous. I didn't take pictures of the first three because those versions were ICKY! I finally came up with something.
17.THE WARMERS "Poked it With a Sick"
Among the highly skilled workforce are scattered a hundred or so typically timid and self-effacing souls with bulging foreheads and dreamy eyes behind thick glasses. They are the Singaporean quants, and this short article is their story.
You make music, films, perfumes, clothes, shoes, condoms, and pretty much every other imaginable merchandise. How many hours a night do you mange to sleep?
'Well what shall we do about the tip?'
Covered with leaves, branches, dirt, and grape vines.
Twitter (again)
My muscles clench, my toes curl. My eyelashes are entwined with my brows, so open are my eyes. Every noise outside is magnified. Every creak indoors enhanced. Somewhere, in another room, a child coughs. I freeze, waiting for further cries. Nothing. And yet I lie stiff, ready for action, thoughts in turmoil.
"Oh. You screamed like there was a man eating spider attacking your face."
Prior to forming the band, Bobby and Leo would play acoustic Against Me! covers in a laundromat in their hometown of Scranton. No one wanted to be in a Ska band anymore as that scene was slowly fading, so the future was unknown. Members Zach, Leo and Bob knew each other since their days back in high school, then they met Bill when they played Cafe Metropolis in Wilkes-Barre, PA with The Max Levine Ensemble and Bill’s band at the time, Jerk Reaction. Ben Walsh of Tigers Jaw was playing drums for CWS at this show. Since then, they have all became friends and started to play more shows together.
It's here at last, a little later than last year, but it's Saleabration time again! YAY!
As I screamed my pleasure both cocks emptied their loads inside me. I lay back on the floor as the cum dribbled from my holes. I wanted to remove my blindfold but found I hadn’t the strength. Instead I just stretched out and luxuriated in the feeling of being happily well fucked.
I’m in Clipper City, at James Joyce, drinking James Joyce Amber by Clipper City Brew Co (now known as Heavy Seas). A perfect match! For a mild day in Baltimore, this is really the best. Pretty golden color, crisp taste. Slight sweet maltiness. I love saying this: high drinkability! Ha. Nice beer.
Not much time remains. The integrity of my support system wanes with alacrity. The once almost infinite space closes in upon me, rejects me. If I fight my expulsion, I’ll have to begin anew, no lessons learned, no progress toward redemption.
concerning the nature of the self and human consciousness
get you?
Yep - sex still sells. Actually, I should have known the last piece would rank high - Blogger stats say that my most-read post until now was "They Are Not Hooker Shoes!"
All that to say….skinny ties with skinny lapels, guys–at least for now.
Next, I was met with very strong cold winds. Not expected… and very distracting.
How is this done? We see this system explained in Romans 6:3,4. This is basic information for he begins,
The Act also requires a Congressional ‘super-committee’ to devise a bill that eliminates at least an additional $1.2 trillion of the budget deficit by FY 2021. If this deficit reduction bill is not enacted into law by January 15, 2012, The Act imposes a different set of discretionary spending caps for FY 2013 through 2021 for the ‘security’ and the ‘non-security’ category, but it also redefines the meaning of the categories. The net effect of the change is to focus spending cuts on he Defense Department, if Congress fails in its mission.
Although I only live ten minutes walk from the slipway, I don't go out there that often - you have to time it right because the island is cut off at high tide and I'm not a great planner-ahead. Also an afternoon building a dry stone wall in the seaward side with an ill-fated council staff volunteer scheme turned my bad cold into bronchitis and the brink of pneumonia back in 2005, which put me off a bit.
so all I could do was crop them, using paint.
Costume designer Orry-Kelly created the brilliant outfits for the film which ranged from bohemian to chic and must have been a designer's dream. Her jeweled pantsuit with matching silk coat and crystal studded capri pants and chartreuse shawl were just a few of the standouts.
Proteus Gowanus presents the opening reception of the 2nd Paradise exhibition,
47. The Last Hero – Terry Pratchett, read by Stephen Briggs
You know what the crazy thing is? I actually prefer the Zara knockoffs to the real Stuart Weitzman‘s. They look really uncomfortable, but they’re cuter. The Jimmy Choo’s on the other hand, I prefer to Zara’s version. What do you think? Which one’s do you like better? Would you buy any of them? Are you going to the Jimmy Choo sample sale? How much do you want to bet that I will spend at least two hours in line and not actually make it in? I’m sure that’s what will happen. But, if by any chance I do get in there, I will let you know what I see.
I googled so many combinations of things and learned a lot about a lot of programs. But things kept coming up short. My husband figured I was being biased so he pulled out our other laptop to help me search. Luckily he had also used Scrivener so he knew what it was I liked about it. About the same time we both came across a promising program called Celtx. It was free and while I did some research first, he just downloaded it and started messing around with it. Celtx has a free version as well as a paid version,though it’s a lot cheaper than Scrivener. He liked the program right away and insisted I download it to the other laptop and just try it.
For this Tuesday's card I didn't like the Over the Hill one I created so instead I saw this idea on Etsy and knew I wanted to try to recreate it!
What if the State Senate were Democratic, as it should be without gerrymandering, and State Senator Velmanette Montgomery, an AY opponent, had more of an impact? What if the investigation of Senate Majority Leader Joseph Bruno, one of the “three men in a room,” had started earlier?
YEAAAH!
Yellow dog is a little mad she doesn’t get to sleep with my roommate. It’s funny, she throws a fit for a couple of nights when I come home after I’ve been gone (or shacking up at your place), but then she settles back into the routine of going to bed with me. And in the morning, she never wants to get up and go outside – she’ll sleep as late as I do sometimes.
Here are next week's live show dates again:
There's a thing that happens sometimes with these kinds of movies, though: there are some who watch your celluloid product and see something more than what was created. In that instance, your work achieves a level of competence not even the producer anticipated. It becomes something... different, like when Dorothy and company each saw their own version of The Wizard in that old book from long ago.
The allegations first came to light in an interview Mr. Okah granted Arabic satellite television, Al Jazeera in October 2010 weeks after the blast. In the interview, he blamed the attacks on Mr. Jonathan’s aides and claimed he was arrested for refusing to influence MEND, to retract its claim of responsibility.
She has moved beyond the pain and now enjoys only the pleasure
These examples demonstrate the trifecta of celebrity, news media, and politics. The influence of the relationship does not flow in a single direction; this isn’t just politicians cozying up to entertainers or celebrities adopting causes they may or may not believe in for photo ops. This is a complete system in which the three are bonded together in a triple helix and there is no pulling them apart.
Many a soul has hired a contractor to do repairs or improvements on a home only to find something is fishy. Here are some tips to avoid problems.
Thanks to Katherine (who kindly visited my blog and commented) @ Feather Factor – the deeply buried cravings have come back to the surface to haunt me and make me salivate. And since I can’t afford to satisfy this craving due to financial reasons, I will instead write about it – I call them my “dream-y” Hermes bags because right now that’s all I can do.
Added Brett Good, a senior district president with Robert Half International, “Companies that are not ready to make a full-time hire, often fill human resource needs on a temporary basis so they can staff up and or down as business needs demands change. Temporary and project professionals provide access to skills on a right-now basis and can give businesses more control over their human resourcespersonnel budgets.”
Vietnam’s investment in Myanmar hit 23.649 million USD as of November, 2011 since Myanmar opened to foreign investment in late 1988, according to official statistics.
I'm sure Aunt Millie would understand.
Anastasia’s Inner Goddess
These are four popular seed growing and saving books that I have collected over the years and am constantly using as references.
Hey Jes,
To me, my profile there is a bit stale. But, yet, I have no desire to update it. I rarely interact over there and I’m only ever, even reminded of linkedin when I get one of these…
The Occupy Wall Street movement, now into its 4th week, is beginning to influence other states, as well.
The police chief is far from amused.
NT: My view of Rebekah is controversial and at odds with a lot of people at News International who seek to place the blame for everything on her shoulders. She didn’t close down the paper. Rupert and James Murdoch did. While I was her news editor, I found her to be bright, imaginative, inspiring, loyal, good natured, utterly professional and totally dedicated. She could however be moody. And if anyone provided incontrovertible proof that one of her project ideas was unworkable, it could take forever to move her. I don’t mind admitting I am extremely fond of her. I’m afraid bail conditions prohibit telephone calls from Chipping Norton. But if she could, I’m sure she’d call to tell me to calm down and stop fooling around.
145g (10 TB) cold butter, cut into pieces
I'm not Christian so the whole "birth of our savior" thing is kind of lost on me. I love a lot of people who are christian and I am hopeful for them they get out of this day what they need to get out of. In my childhood and young adult I spent the christmas seasons frightened out of my mind. It brought out the worst in my family. My sister is still the MOST ungrateful person on the planet, my mother fraught with expectation so high no one could reach them, and my dad just miserable that his life was,,,,well his life. He hated his job and it ate his soul daily so spending the blood money from it on useless gifts was hard to watch for him. I was stuck in the middle of being the only feeler in the family, enjoyment out of getting great gifts, and guilt because I could read the very air we stood in and it was gasoline waiting to be lit.
So, solutions you say?
The second (and more difficult) test to pass is the willingness of the winning party to be called to account, and to have its decisions weighed and measured by independent institutions against the yardstick of a bill of rights and just laws. This test of democracy requires that ruling parties accept limitations on their powers by institutions acting in the interests of the people as a whole, not just the ruling clique of the majority party.
But did you know that CSN also carries
The item I wanted to return was a thing called Pixel Chix. It's a small hand held device that has a pixelated person do various things in this virtual world. It's cute and for what they cost ($20) they are a nice alternative to the game boy things, I suppose. Well she loved it when she got one back in August for her birthday. She called it her GAME GIRL which I thought was very sweet - since everyone else she knows has GAME BOYS. I personally thought it was dumb, but hey, she liked it. Key word being she LIKED it, as in past tense and no longer does. She liked it in August and when I asked her in December for gift ideas this came up. Great! I typically save ideas for various people in the family so that I don't give the same ideas to everyone and she ends up with duplicates. I should have remembered that I hadn't seen this toy since August, but alas - I didn't.
Our embryo transfer is only 3 sleeps away! I am so excited about it. I am hoping I've done what my embryos need to stay with me. I stopped in my local clinic to check my lining and estrogen levels. I measured at 12mm for lining and my estrogen is 526 so I am cushy and ready to go!
In my next module I will be moving up a gear and taking a Level 2 course either on English Language or in English Literature. Those subjects are in my main domain of interest so I am sure that I will be able to keep the motivational levels a lot higher than when studying topics like classical music (being tone deaf), art (being colour blind) and religion (being agnostic). So the first module is almost done, I’ve done well but I’ve not really tucked into the main course as yet.
Witnesses in the Champion case have told his parents he might have been targeted because he opposed the culture of hazing they say has long existed in the band, the parents’ attorney has said. It has also been suggested to them that he was targeted because Champion was gay and a candidate for chief drum major.
Matt Farrell: You just killed a helicopter with a car!
i didn’t answer, and took another bite of my pop tart.
Good morning! I am excited about the new arrangement my husband came up with for the office!!! We moved some furniture around...I am now working on the butcher block table to make my cards and we removed the card table. We can move around in this room once again. It is going to be a fun space to stamp!
“Thanks. Hey, do you know a word for ‘hairy’?”
My heart is full of love and concern for all my blogging pals that are going through such trials, please keep looking up, and know you are NOT alone!
While cooling, prepare Peanut Butter Frosting
For those of you who don't know, project pan 10 is where you aim to finish, or hit the pan of 10 different make up items before you buy any new ones. I'm going to aim to finish 10 whole products before I start on my 2012 make up wishlist which should make me appreciate my new products a whole lot more.
Here is the photo's I provided her with.
Hope things are very undull for you,
